seal.gif (3115 bytes) STATE RACING COMMISSION Mitt Romney Governor Kerry Healey Lieutenant Governor Beth Lindstrom Director, Office of Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation Joseph Betro Chairman _________________________________________________________________ 205 CMR: STATE RACING COMMISSION 205 CMR 4.00: RULES OF HORSE RACING Section 4.01: Foreword 4.02: Definitions 4.03: Appeal to the Commission 4.04: Stable Names, Registration Fees, Restrictions, etc.
4.05: Authorized Agent-Licenses, Filing Instrument, etc.
4.06: Claiming
4.07: Clerk of the Scales, Duties, etc.
4.08: Colors, Registration Fees, etc.
4.09: Corporations
4.10: Corrupt Practices
4.11: Rules of the Race
4.12: Forfeitures and Suspensions
4.13: General Rules
4.14: Handicapper
4.15: Jockey
4.16: Jockey Agents
4.17: Jockey Apprentices
4.18: Jockey Contracts
4.19: Jockey Room Custodian
4.20: Licensee's Duties, Obligations, etc.
4.21: Licenses, Registrations and Fees for Participants in Racing
4.22: Naming of Jockeys
4.23: Owner
4.24: Paddock Judge
4.25: Paddock to Post
4.26: Partnerships
4.27: Patrol Judges
4.28: Placing Judges
4.29: Postponement and Cancellation of Races
4.30: Racing Officials
4.31: Racing Secretary
4.32: Urine, Other Tests and Examinations
4.33: Starter
4.34: Steeplechasing
4.35: Stewards
4.36: Trainers
4.37: Vendors of Horse Feed or Medicine
4.38: Veterinarians
4.39: Walking Over
4.40: Weighing In
4.41: Weighing Out
4.42: Winnings
4.43: Special Rules for State or County Fairs
4.44: Declarations and Scratches for State and County Fairs
4.45: General Rules for State and County Fairs
4.46: Paddock Judge for State and County Fairs
4.01: Foreword
The Massachusetts State Racing Commission, hereinafter called the Commission, was created by an act of the Legislature of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts in the year 1934.
M.G.L. c. 128A as inserted by St. 1934, c. 374 and amendments states that the Commission shall have full power to prescribe rules, regulations and conditions under which all horse races or horse racing meetings shall be conducted in the Commonwealth.
205 CMR 4.00, as herein prescribed apply to all persons or individuals, associations or corporations, which shall hold or conduct any running horse racing meeting within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts licensed by the Commission, where horse racing shall be permitted for any stake, purse or reward and the definitions here given are to be considered in connection with 205 CMR 4.00 and as a part of it.
All licensees and participants are charged with knowledge of 205 CMR 4.00.
No licensee or other persons shall engage in his or her occupation at any Massachusetts running horseracing track without first reading 205 CMR 4.00.
Should any question arise as to the meaning of any rule or regulation, the Commission or its representatives will be available to provide an explanation.
Every license to hold a meeting is granted upon the condition that the licensee shall accept, observe and enforce 205 CMR 4.00.
Furthermore; it shall be the duty of each and every officer, director and every official and employee of said licensee to observe and enforce 205 CMR 4.00.
Any and all of 205 CMR 4.00 may be amended, altered, repealed or supplemented by new and additional rules.
The Commission may make exceptions or waive any rule or rules in individual instances as in its judgment it may deem proper.
The Commission may rescind, modify of increase any penalty or decision on infraction of the rules imposed or made by the racing officials.
The laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and 205 CMR 4.00 supersede the conditions of a race, or the regulations of race meeting.
205 CMR 4.00 is supplemented by the State Administrative Procedure Law found in M.G.L. c. 30A.
M.G.L. c. 30A provides the procedures that must be followed by all state agencies on such matters as the amending process and the adjudicatory procedure.
Under this act any interested party has the right to attend all hearings conducted by the Commission for the purpose of the adoption or amendment of any rule or regulation.
The Commission shall afford any interested person an opportunity to present data, views or arguments in regard to any proposed rule change.
Upon written notice to the Commission, a person may request the adoption, amendment or repeal of any regulation with an opportunity to present data, views or arguments in support of such request.
If a dispute should arise concerning a ruling by a steward or other racing official, any party affected by such ruling has a right to an appeal to the Commission upon written notice to the Commission within ten days.
At such hearing each party shall be given an opportunity to be represented by an attorney, to call and examine witnesses, to introduce exhibits, to cross-examine witnesses who testify and to submit rebuttal evidence.
The Commission shall make available upon request an official record of the hearing and a party may request and receive a transcript of such record upon payment to the Commission of the cost of such transcript.
The Commission shall provide, in writing, its decision along with findings of fact and conclusions of law.
Any person who does not agree with a final decision of the Commission shall be entitled to judicial review of such decision by filing a petition for review in Superior Court within 30 days after receipt of notice of the final decision of the Commission.
The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and, in most instances, shall be confined to the record.
The rules on pari-mutuel wagering are located in an entirely separate rulebook entitled 205 CMR 6.00 Pari-mutuel Rules for Horse Racing, Harness Horse Racing and Greyhound Racing.
4.02: DEFINITIONS
The following definitions and interpretations shall apply in the Rules unless the text otherwise requires:
1.
"Act" is the enabling legislation permitting pari-mutuel horse racing in this jurisdiction.
2.
"Added Money" is the amount added into a stakes by the Association, or by sponsors, state-bred programs or other funds added to those monies gathered by nomination, entry, sustaining and other fees coming from the horsemen.
3.
"Age" of a horse foaled in North America shall be reckoned from the first day of January of the year of foaling.
4.
"Also Eligible" pertains to: (a) a number of eligible horses, properly entered, which were not drawn for inclusion in a race, but which become eligible according to preference or lot if an entry is scratched prior to the scratch time deadline; (b) The next preferred non-qualifier for the finals or consolation from a set of elimination trials which will become eligible in the event a finalist is scratched by the stewards for a rule violation or is otherwise eligible if written race conditions permit.
5.
"Allowance Race" is an overnight race for which eligibility and weight to be carried is determined according to specified conditions that include age, sex, earnings and number of wins.
6.
"Appeal" is a request for the Commission or its designee to investigate, consider and review any decision or rulings of stewards of a meeting.
7.
"Arrears" are all monies owed by a licensee, including subscriptions, jockey fees, forfeitures and any default incident to these rules.
8.
"Association" any person or persons, associations, or corporations licensed by the Commission to conduct horse racing within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts for any stake, purse or reward.
9.
"Association Grounds" is all real property utilized by the Association in the conduct of its race meeting, including the racetrack, grandstand, concession stands, offices, barns, stable area, employee housing facilities and parking lots.
10.
"Authorized Agent" is a person licensed by the Commission and appointed by a written instrument, signed and acknowledged before a notary public by the owner in whose behalf the agent will act.
11.
"Beneficial Interest" is profit, benefit or advantage resulting from a contract or the ownership of an estate as distinct from the legal ownership or control.
When considered as designation or character of an estate, is such an interest as a devisee, legatee or done taken solely for his own use or benefit and not as holder of title for use and benefit of another.
12.
"Betting Interest" is one or more horses in a pari-mutuel contest, which are identified by a single program number for wagering purposes.
13.
"Bleeder List" is a tabulation of all bleeders to be maintained by the Commission.
14.
"Breeder" is the owner of the horse's dam at the time of foaling.
15.
"Calendar Day" is twenty-four hours ending at midnight.
16.
"Claiming Race" is a race in which any horse starting may be claimed (purchased for a designated amount) in conformance with the rules.
17.
"Commission" is the regulatory agency with the authority to regulate racing.
18.
"Conditions" are qualifications that determine a horse's eligibility to be entered in a race.
19.
"Contest" is a competitive racing event on which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted.
20.
"Contestant" is an individual horse participating in a contest.
21.
"Coupled Entry" is two (2) or more contestants in a contest that are treated as a single betting interest for pari-mutuel wagering purposes (also see "Entry").
22.
"Day" is a 24-hour period beginning at 12:01 A.M. and ending at 12:00 P.M. midnight.
23.
"Dead Heat" is the finish of a race in which the noses of two (2) or more horses reach the finish line at the same time.
24.
"Declaration" is the act of withdrawing an entered horse from a race prior to the closing of entries.
25.
"Ejected" shall mean the removal from the grounds of an Association and shall apply to both patrons at racing meetings and participants in racing.
26.
"Entry" is: (a) a horse made eligible to run in a race; (b) two or more horses, entered in the same race, which have common ties of ownership, lease or training.
27.
"Equipment" as applied to a horse, shall mean whips, spurs, blinkers, tongue straps, muzzles, hoods, nose-bands, bits, shadow rolls, martingales, breast plates, bandages, boots, plates, etc. 28.
"Exhibition Race" is a race on which no wagering is permitted.
29.
"Financial Interest" is an interest that could result in directly or indirectly receiving a pecuniary gain or sustaining a pecuniary loss as a result of ownership or interest in a horse or business entity; or as a result of salary, gratuity or other compensation or remuneration from any person.
The lessee and lessor of a horse have a financial interest.
30.
"Flat Race" is a race in which horses mounted by jockeys run over a course on which no jumps or other obstacles are placed.
31.
"Forfeit" is money due from a licensee because of error, fault, neglect of duty, breach of contract or a penalty imposed by the Stewards or the Commission.
32.
"General Partner" shall mean the person or persons having full, exclusive and complete control and discretion of the management of the affairs of a Limited Partnership.
33.
"Guest Association" is an association which offers licensed pari-mutuel wagering on contests conducted by another association (the host) in either the same state of another jurisdiction.
34.
"Handicap" is a race in which the weights to be carried by the horses are assigned by the racing secretary or handicapper for the purpose of equalizing the chances of winning for all horses entered.
35.
"Horse" is any equine (including and designated as a mare, filly, stallion, colt, ridgeling or gelding) registered for racing; specifically, an entire male 5 years of age or older.
36.
"Host Association" is the association conducting a licensed pari-mutuel meeting from which authorized contests or entire performances are simulcast.
37.
"Inquiry" is an investigation by the Stewards of potential interference in a contest prior to declaring the result of said contest official.
38.
"Jockey" is a professional rider licensed to ride in races.
39.
"Law or Laws" shall mean M.G.L. c. 128A (being the general laws pertaining to horse racing) and as further amended from time to time.
40.
"Licensee" is any person or entity holding a license from the Commission to engage in racing or a regulated activity.
41.
"Limited Partnership" shall mean any person holding an interest in a horse, who is not a general partner.
42.
"Maiden" is a horse that has never won an official or recognized race as defined in breed registry rules.
43.
"Maiden Race" is a contest restricted to non-winners.
44.
"Match Race" is a race between two (2) horses under conditions agreed to by their owners.
45.
"Meeting" is the specified period and dates each year during which an association is authorized to conduct racing by approval of the Commission.
46.
"Month" is a calendar month.
47.
"Multiple Ownership" shall mean any owner ship of a horse by more than one individual.
48.
"Mutuel Field" is two (2) or more contestants in a contest that are treated as a single betting interest for pari-mutuel wagering purposes because the number of betting interests exceeds the number that can be handled individually by the pari-mutuel system.
49.
"Nomination" is the naming of a horse to a certain race or series of races generally accompanied by payment of a prescribed fee.
50.
"Nominator" is the person or entity in whose name a horse is nominated for a race or series of races.
51.
"Objection" is: (a) a written complaint made to the Stewards concerning a horse entered in a race and filed not later than (1) hour prior to the scheduled post time of the first race on the day in which the questioned horse is entered: (b) a verbal claim of foul in a race lodged by the horse's jockey, trainer, owner or the owner's authorized agent before the race is declared official.
52.
"Official Order of Finish" is the order of finish of the horses in a contest as declared official by the Stewards.
53.
"Official Starter" is the official responsible for dispatching the horses for a race.
54.
"Official Time" is the elapsed time from the moment the first horse crosses the starting point until the first horse crosses the finish line.
55.
"Off Time" is the moment at which, on the signal of the official starter, the doors of the starting gate are opened, officially dispatching the horses in each contest.
56.
"Optional Claiming Race" is a contest restricted to horses entered to be claimed for a stated claiming price and to those which have started previously for that claiming price or less.
In the case of horses entered to be claimed in such a race, the race shall be considered, for the purpose of these rules, a claiming race.
In the case of horses not entered to be claimed, the race shall be considered an allowance race.
57.
"Overnight Race" is a contest for which entries close at a time set by the racing secretary; also known as "Purse Race."
58.
"Owner" is a person who holds any title, right or interest, whole or partial in a horse, including the lessee and lessor of a horse.
59.
"Paddock" is an enclosure in which horses scheduled to compete in a contest are saddled prior to racing.
60.
"Pari-Mutuel System" is a manual, electro-mechanical, or computerized system and all software (including the totalisator, account betting system and off-site betting equipment) that is used to record bets and transmit wagering data.
61.
"Patron" is a member of the public present on the grounds of a pari-mutuel association during a meeting for the purpose of wagering or to observe racing.
62.
"Performance" is a schedule of contests conducted on the same day as authorized by the Commission.
63.
"Permit" is an authorization by the Commission to an association to conduct horse racing with pari-mutuel wagering at a specified location.
64.
"Person" is any individual, partnership, corporation or other association or entity.
65.
"Place" in racing shall mean first, second, third, or fourth, and in that order is called "Win," "Place," "Show" and "Fourth".
66.
"Post Position" is the pre-assigned position from which a horse will leave the starting gate.
67.
"Post Time" is the scheduled starting time for a contest.
68.
"Prima Facie Evidence" is evidence that, until other evidence overcomes its effect, will suffice as proof of fact in issue.
69.
"Produce Race" is one in which the produce of horses named or described at the time of entry are the contestants.
70.
"Program" is the published listing of all contests and contestants for a specific performance.
71.
"Protest" is a written objection charging that a horse is ineligible to race, alleging improper entry procedures, or citing an act or an owner, trainer, jockey or official prohibited by rules, which, if true, shall exclude that horse/jockey from racing.
72.
"Purse" is the total cash amount for which a race is contested.
73.
"Race" is a contest between horses at a licensed meeting.
74.
"Race Day" means any period of twenty-four (24) hours beginning at midnight and included in the period of a race meeting -- and in a matter of penalties the word "day" means a "calendar day."
75.
"Restricted Area" is an enclosed portion of the association grounds to which access is limited to licensees whose occupation or participation requires access.
76.
"Result" is that part of the official order of finish used to determine the pari-mutuel payoff of pools for each individual contest.
77.
"Ruled Off" shall mean the act of debarring from the grounds of an Association and denying all racing privileges.
78.
"Rules" shall mean the Rules and Regulations herein prescribed and any amendments or additions thereto.
79.
"Scratch" is the act of withdrawing an entered horse from a contest after closing of entries.
80.
"Scratch Time" is the deadline set by the association for withdrawal of entries from a scheduled performance.
81.
"Simulcast" is the live audio and visual transmission of a contest to another location for pari-mutuel wagering purposes.
82.
"Stable Name" is a name used other than the actual legal name of an owner or lessee and registered with the Commission.
83.
"Stakes Race" is a contest in which nominations, entry and/or starting fees contribute to the purse.
84.
"Starter" is a horse that becomes an actual contestant in a race by virtue of the starting gate opening in front of it upon dispatch by the official starter.
85.
"Steeplechase Race" is a contest in which horses mounted by jockeys run over a course on which jumps or other obstacles are placed.
86.
"Steward" is a duly appointed racing official with powers and duties specified by rules.
87.
"Subscription" shall mean the act of nomination to a stake race.
88.
"Substantial Evidence" is a evidence which a reasoning mind would accept as sufficient to support a particular conclusion and consists of more than a mere scintilla of evidence but may be somewhat less than a preponderance.
89.
"Suspended" shall mean that any privilege granted to a licensee of the Commission by the officials of a racing meeting or by the Commission has been withdrawn.
90.
"Trial Race" is part of a series of contests in which horses participate for the purpose of determining eligibility for a subsequent contest.
91.
"Walkover" is a race in which only one (1) horse starts or in which all the starters are owned by the same interest.
92.
"Week" is a calendar week and/or any seven (7) consecutive days.
93.
"Weigh In" is the presentation of a jockey to the clerk of scales for weighing after a race.
94.
"Weigh Out" is the presentation of a jockey to the clerk of scales for weighing prior to a race.
95.
"Weight for Age" is a race in which a fixed scale is used to assign the weight to be carried by individual horse according to age, sex, distance of the race, and season of the year.
96.
"Winner" is the horse whose nose reaches the finish line first or is placed first through disqualification by the stewards.
97.
"Year" is a calendar year.
4.03: Appeal to the Commission
(1) A final appeal in the case of any person penalized or disciplined by the racing officials of a meeting licensed by the Commission, may be taken to the Commission.
(2) Such an appeal must be filed in writing at the office of the Commission within ten (10) days of date of said penalty or imposition of said discipline.
(3) The request shall be signed by the person making it and must set forth his reason for believing he is entitled to a hearing.
(4) An applicant for a hearing will be heard in person and may be represented by counsel.
(5) All complaints and requests to the Commission must be in writing, and all papers filed with the Commission shall be the property of the Commission.
(6) An appeal from a decision of a racing official to the Commission shall not affect such decision until the Commission has acted upon the appeal.
4.04: Stable Names, Registration Fees, Restrictions, etc.
(1) Each Stable name must be duly registered with the Commission.
(2) In applying to race under a stable name the applicant must disclose the identity or identities behind a stable name.
If a partnership is involved in the identity behind a stable name the rules covering partnerships must be complied with and the usual fees paid therefor in addition to the fees for the registration of a stable name.
(3) If a corporation is involved in the identity behind a stable name, the rules covering corporations must be complied with.
(4) Changes in identities must be reported immediately to and approval obtained from the Commission.
(5) A person cannot register more than one stable name at the same time nor can he use his real name for racing purposes, so long as he has a registered one.
(6) Any person who has registered under a stable name may at any time, cancel it after he has given written notice to the Commission.
(7) A stable name may be changed at any time by registering a new stable name and by paying the fee required as above.
(8) A person cannot register as his stable name one which has been registered by any other person with any association conducting a recognized meeting.
(9) A person may not register as his stable name one which is the real name of any owner of race horses nor one which is the real or assumed name of any prominent person not owning race horses.
(10) A stable name shall be plainly distinguishable from that of another duly registered stable name.
(11) No stable name shall be used, if in the judgment of the Stewards, it is being used for advertising purposes.
(12) A corporate name shall be considered a stable name for the purpose of 205 CMR 4.00, but the Commission reserves the right to refuse any corporation the privilege of registering a stable name.
(13) A trainer, who is a licensed owner or part owner, may use a stable name as owner or part owner.
However, no trainer may be licensed as a trainer other than in his legal name.
4.05: Authorized Agent-Licenses, Filing Instrument, etc.
(1) Each authorized agent must obtain a license from the Commission.
(2) Application for a license must be filed for each owner represented.
(3) If a written instrument signed by the owner accompanies the application it shall clearly set forth among the delegated powers whether or not said agent is empowered to collect money from the Association.
(4) If the written instrument is a power of attorney, it shall be filed permanently with the Racing Secretary.
If, however, the powers are properly delegated by the owner on the application form for a license then said application shall be in duplicate with both copies signed and sworn to before a Notary Public and one copy filed permanently with the Racing Secretary.
(5) An Authorized Agent may appoint a sub-agent only when specifically authorized so to do by the above said written instrument and, to be effective, notice of such appointment must be given immediately in writing to the Commission.
(6) Any changes must be in writing and filed as above provided.
(7) If an agent represents more than one owner a separate written instrument shall be filed for each owner and the fee paid in each case.
(8) The term of the license shall be the calendar year unless the owner revokes the agent's appointment or the Commission revokes the license.
(9) Owner's revocations must be filed in writing with the Commission and with the Racing Secretary.
4.06: Claiming
(1) In claiming races any horse is subject to claim for its entered price by any owner registered in good faith for racing at the meeting who has started a horse at the meeting (such starter includes all horses that go to the post up to and including the race in which the claim is made), or by his authorized agent.
Said claim is for the account only of the owner making the claim or for whom the claim was made by the agent provided.
No person shall claim his own horse or cause his horse to be claimed directly or indirectly for his own account provided further that the horse the claimant has started shall in the opinion of the Stewards justify his right to claim.
(2) No one may claim more than one horse out of any one race.
(3) No authorized agent, although representing several owners shall submit more than one claim for any one race.
(4) When a stable consists of horses owned by more than one person, trained by the same trainer, not more than one claim may be entered on behalf of such stable in any one race.
(5) A claimed horse shall not race elsewhere until after the close of the meeting at which it was claimed or until 60 calendar days the day after the claim, whichever comes first.
(6) The adoption by any state of any rule limiting the amount at which a horse may be entered in a claiming race shall not be deemed inconsistent with the foregoing rule.
(7) When a horse is claimed at a recognized meeting under rules that are at variance with 205 CMR 4.06, title to such horse shall be recognized in Massachusetts to follow the rule of the meeting under which it was claimed.
(8) Not more than two horses of the same ownership or interest shall be entered in a claiming race and both may start except that two horses coupled by common ownership shall not start if it deprives an uncoupled horse of starting.
(9) If a horse is claimed it shall not be sold or transferred to anyone wholly or in part, except in a claiming race, for a period of 30 days from the date of claim (the day of the claim and the 30th day from the day of the claim shall not be counted), nor shall it, unless reclaimed, remain in the same stable or under the control or management of its former owner or trainer for a like period.
(10) The claiming price of each horse in a claiming race shall be printed on the program, and all claims for said horse shall be for the amount so designated.
Should more than one claim be filed for the same horse, the disposition of the horse shall be determined by lot under direction and supervision of one or more of the Stewards.
(11) All claims must be made in writing, on forms and in envelopes furnished by the Association and approved by the Commission.
Both forms and envelopes must be filled out completely and must be sufficiently accurate to identify the claim; otherwise the claim will be void.
(12) Each person desiring to make a claim must first deposit with the Association's horsemen's bookkeeper the whole amount of the claim in cash plus any amount that may be required by Federal, State or Local law as a tax, for which a receipt will be given unless at the time of depositing said claim he shall have such amount to his credit with the Association.
(13) All claims shall be sealed and deposited in a locked box provided for this purpose.
No money shall accompany the claim.
(14) When a claim has been filed it is irrevocable and at the risk of the claimant.
(15) The money deposited for any claimed horse shall be held by the Racing Secretary until the registration certificate on the claimed horse is surrendered, though the claimed horse may go on and race for the new owner or owners, regardless.
(16) All claims shall be deposited in the claiming box at least ten (10) minutes before the established post time of each race; shall be certified by an approved time stamp and the claim box shall be opened only in the presence of the Stewards or their deputy.
(17) No official or other employee of an Association shall give any information as to the filing of claims until after the race has been run.
(18) The Stewards or their deputy shall pass upon all claims.
(19) A horse claimed shall not be delivered by the original owner to the successful claimant until authorization shall be given by the clerk of the Course, and every horse so claimed shall run in the interest and for the account of the owner who entered it in the race, but title to the claimed horse shall be vested in the successful claimant from time said horse becomes a "STARTER" (the word "Starter" to mean when the horse enters the track from the paddock for claiming purposes only) and said claimant shall become the owner of the horse, whether it be alive or dead, sound or unsound or injured during the race or after it.
(20) The Stewards may, at any time, at their discretion, require any person making a claim for a horse in any claiming race, to make affidavit in writing that he is claiming said horse for his own account or as authorized agent and not for any other person.
Any person making such affidavit willfully and falsely shall be subject to punishment in the same manner as is hereinafter provided for the punishment of other persons' violation of any of the terms of 205 CMR 4.06.
(21) No person shall refuse to deliver to the person legally entitled thereto a horse claimed out of a claiming race, and furthermore, the horse in question shall be disqualified until delivery is made.
(22) No person shall offer, or enter into an agreement, to claim or not to claim, or attempt to prevent another person from claiming, any horse in a claiming race; nor shall any person attempt by intimidation to prevent any one from running a horse in any race for which it is entered nor shall any owner or trainer running horses in any claiming race make any agreement for the protection of each other's horses.
(23) No person or persons shall enter, or allow to be entered, in a claiming race, a horse against which any claim is held, either as a mortgage, bill of sale, or lien of any kind, unless when or before entering the horse the written consent of the holder of the claim shall be filed with the Clerk of the Course of the Association conducting said race.
(24) Any alteration in the sex of a horse must be reported in writing by its owner or trainer to the Racing Secretary or Horse Identification Office on a form provided for that purpose at least 24 hours previous to the time of entry.
The completed form shall be attached to the foal certificate.
Notwithstanding any designation of sex appearing on the racing program or in any racing publication, the claimant of a horse shall be solely responsible for determining the sex of the horse claimed.
(25) When a horse is claimed out of a claiming race, the horse's engagements are included.
(26) Any person or persons claiming ownership in a horse after such horse has run in a claiming race in the name of another person having peaceful and undisputed possession of that horse shall be ruled off.
(27) Should any stable registered at a meeting be eliminated by sale or removal from the stable area of the Association, the right to claim is void.
(28) When a stable has been eliminated by claiming, the owner so affected (if he has not acquired a horse before the close of the meeting) may obtain a certificate from the Stewards of the meeting and on presentation of that certificate, the owner shall be entitled to claim during the next 30 racing days at any recognized meeting in this state, until he has claimed a horse.
Stables eliminated by fire and other hazards may also be permitted to claim under 205 CMR 4.06 (28) at the discretion of the Stewards.
(205 CMR 4.06(28) shall not apply at State or County Fairs) (29) The claiming rules set forth above shall apply to all races under the jurisdiction of the Commission, including steeplechases, which are run under claiming conditions; provided, however that in any such steeplechase no horse shall be subject to claim except by the owners of other horses running in such race, or their authorized agent, but for the account of the person making the claim.
(30) Any person violating any of the provisions of 205 CMR 4.06 shall be subject to punishment by the Stewards who may, in their discretion, punish the person so offending by forfeiture or suspension or ruling off, or by denying the privilege of the course.
The Stewards shall, in every case, report their action to the Commission which may exclude such person either temporarily or permanently from all race meetings under its jurisdiction.
(31) The Stewards shall issue a claiming authorization to any person who makes an application on forms prescribed for that purpose and who:
(a) Meets all the requirements for the issuance of an owner's license, except that the applicant need not own a horse or have any previous experience in racing.
(That does not apply to owners whose stables have been eliminated by sale, claiming, fire or other hazards within the previous 12 months.)
(b) Has an agreement with a licensed trainer to train any horse claimed pursuant to the claiming authorization.
The holder of a claiming authorization and the trainer shall promptly notify the Stewards in writing if such agreement is terminated before a horse is successfully claimed.
(c) Has on deposit with the horsemen's bookkeeper the amount of the claim plus any amount that may be required by Federal, State, or Local law as a tax.
(32) The claiming authorization shall be valid only at the track that the authorization is granted for the calendar year in which it is issued, or until such time as the holder of the claiming authorization becomes a horse owner either through use of the claiming authorization or through private purchase.
If the authorization card does not accompany the claim blank when filed it shall be voided.
(33) The same fee charged for an Owner's license shall be payable to the Commission by the applicant prior to the issuance of a claiming authorization.
The holder of a claiming authorization shall not, by virtue thereof, be entitled to admission to the stable area, grandstand, or clubhouse at prices less than those charged the general public.
(34) Any horse claimed under the provisions of 205 CMR 4.00 must race exclusively in Massachusetts at the track claimed for a period of 60 days following the date of the claim.
If racing concludes at the track where the horse is claimed for a period in excess of 30 days and no other Massachusetts track offers other races suitable for that horse, the Stewards may permit said horse to race elsewhere prior to the end of the 60-day period.
(35) An application for claiming authorization may be denied or revoked, for any reason that would justify denial, suspension, or revocation of an owner's license.
Any person whose claiming authorization is denied or revoked shall have the same rights to notice and hearing as an owner whose license is denied, suspended or revoked.
(36) When an Owner ships a horse in for racing purposes from another jurisdiction and does not have any other horses stabled on the grounds and said horse is claimed, the Owner so affected may obtain a certificate from Stewards of the meeting, and on presentation of the certificate, the Owner shall be entitled to claim during the next 30 days or until such time as he has claimed a horse.
4.07: Clerk of the Scales, Duties, etc.
(1) The Clerk of the Scales shall weigh all jockeys out and in. (2) 
Every jockey who is engaged to ride in a race shall report to the scale room on the day of the race at the time required by the officials.
He shall then report his engagements and overweight, if any to the Clerk of the Scales, and thereafter shall not leave the jockey room, except to view the races from a point approved by the Stewards or to ride in a race, until all of his engagements of the day have been fulfilled.
None of the following items shall be included in a jockey's weight: Protective helmet, as may be approved by the Commission; whip or a substitute for a whip, head number, bridle, bit or reins.
4.42: Winnings (1) The winnings of a horse in a stake race shall be computed on the value of the gross earnings.
(2) Winnings shall include all net monies won in all countries, up to the time appointed for the start, including walkovers and forfeits but not second and third money nor the value of a prize not in money.
(3) Winnings during a year shall be reckoned from January 1st of that year.
(4) Winner or non-winner of a specified sum means winner, or non-winner of a single race of that value to the winner, unless otherwise stated.
(5) In computing the value of a series of races in which an extra sum of money is won by the winning of two or more races of the series, the extra amount shall not be included in the horse's winnings until the series, or that part of it, is finished and hence the extra amount is definitely ascertainable.
When ascertained it shall be added to the race which determined the extra amount.
(6) Foreign winnings shall be estimated on the basis of the normal rate of exchange prevailing on the day of the winner.
(7) The entrance money, starting and subscription fees, in every race, shall go to the winner unless otherwise provided in its conditions, but when from any cause a race is not run, all stakes or entrance money, if any paid, shall be returned.
4.43: Special Rules for State or County Fairs
M.G.L. c. 128A, � 9, second paragraph provides "The Commission shall have power to prescribe special rules, regulations and conditions applicable to horse and dog racing meetings held under licenses granted hereunder in connection with a state or county fair, or any exhibition for the encouragement of extension of agriculture."
4.44: Declarations and Scratches for State and County Fairs
In purse races and overnight handicaps with more than eight interests, owners shall have the right to declare out to that number before the time stipulated by the regulations of the Association, on the day of the race such right to be determined by lot when necessary.
Declarations below eight interests may only be made by permission from the Stewards.
4.45: General Rules for State and County Fairs
(1) The Stewards at meetings held in connection with State or County Fairs shall have the power to suspend anyone whom they have authority to supervise for no greater period than ten days beyond the close of the fair racing season in Massachusetts.
They may extend a suspension from one fair meeting to another within the fair racing season.
The Stewards at meetings held in connection with State or County Fairs may impose a forfeiture on anyone whom they have authority to supervise, not exceeding $500.00.
(2) Each Association licensed by the Commission to conduct a racing meeting in connection with a State or County Fair shall submit to the Commission a complete list of employees three days after the first racing day.
This must contain in addition to the name and addresses of employees, the position each one is to fill or the duties he is to perform.
All additions made to or changes in the list of employees must be promptly reported to the Commission.
4.46: Paddock Judge for State and County Fair
The Paddock Judge may permit a horse to be excused from parading and be led to the post.
REGULATORY AUTHORITY
205 CMR 4.00: M.G.L. c. 128A, � 9.
_________________________________________________________________
Massachusetts State Racing Commission One Ashburton Place, Room 1313 Boston, MA 02108 Phone: 617-727-2581 Fax: 617-227-6062
Privacy Policy
The clerk of scales shall weigh out jockeys for their respective mounts not more than 30 minutes before post time for each race.
(5) Only valets employed by the association shall assist jockeys in weighing out.
(6) A jockey must wear a safety vest when riding in any official race.
The safety vest shall weigh no more than two pounds and shall be designed to provide shock absorbing protection to the upper body of at least a rating of five, as defined by the British Equestrian Trade Association (BETA), and be manufactured in accordance with current minimum standards established by the Jockeys' Guild.
(7)
A jockey's weight shall include his/her clothing, boots, saddle and its attachments and any other equipment except the whip, bridle, bit or reins, safety helmet, safety vest, blinkers, goggles and number cloth.
(8) Seven pounds is the limit of overweight any horse is permitted to carry.
(9) Once jockeys have fulfilled their riding engagements for the day and have left the jockeys' quarters, they shall not be re-admitted to the jockeys' quarters until after the entire racing program for that day has been completed, except with permission of the stewards.
(D) Paddock to Post
(1) Each horse shall carry the full weight assigned for that race from the paddock to the starting post, and shall parade past the stewards' stand, unless excused by the stewards.
The post parade shall not exceed 12 minutes, unless otherwise ordered by the stewards.
It shall be the duty of the stewards to ensure that the horses arrive at the starting gate as near to post time as possible.
(2) After the horses enter the track, no jockey may dismount nor entrust his horse to the care of an attendant unless, because of accident occurring to the jockey, the horse or the equipment, and with the prior consent of the starter.
During any delay during which a jockey is permitted to dismount, all other jockeys may dismount and others may attend their horses.
After the horses enter the track, only the jockey, an assistant starter, the official veterinarian, the racing veterinarian or an outrider or pony rider may touch the horse before the start of the race.
(3) If a jockey is seriously injured on the way to the post, the horse shall be returned to the paddock and a replacement jockey obtained.
(4) After passing the stewards' stand in parade, the horses may break formation and proceed to the post in any manner unless otherwise directed by the stewards.
Once at the post, the horses shall be started without unnecessary delay.
(5) Horses shall arrive at the starting post in post position order.
(6) In case of accident to a jockey or his/her mount or equipment, the stewards or the starter may permit the jockey to dismount and the horse to be cared for during the delay, and may permit all jockeys to dismount and all horses to be attended to during the delay.
(7) If a jockey is thrown on the way from the paddock to the post, the horse must be remounted, return to the point where the jockey was thrown and then proceed over the route of the parade to the post.
The horse must carry its assigned weight from paddock to post and from post to finish.
(8) If a horse leaves the course while moving from paddock to post, the horse shall be returned to the course at the nearest practical point to that at which it left the course, and shall complete its parade to the post from the point at which it left the course unless ordered scratched by the stewards.
(9) No person shall willfully delay the arrival of a horse at the post.
(10) The starter shall load horses into the starting gate in any order deemed necessary to ensure a safe and fair start.
Only the jockey, the racing veterinarian, the starter or an assistant starter shall handle a horse.
(11) Every horse must be saddled in the paddock.
(E) Post to Finish
(1) The Start (a) The starter is responsible for assuring that each participant receives a fair start.
(b) If, when the starter dispatches the field, any door at the front of the starting gate stalls should not open properly due to a mechanical failure or malfunction or should any action by any starting personnel directly cause a horse to receive an unfair start, the stewards may declare such a horse a non-starter.
(c) Should a horse, not scratched prior to the start, not be in the starting gate stall thereby causing it to be left when the starter dispatches the field, the stewards shall declare the horse a non-starter.
(d) Should an accident or malfunction of the starting gate, or other unforeseeable event compromise the fairness of the race or the safety of race participants, the stewards may declare individual horses to be non-starters, exclude individual horses from one or more pari-mutuel pools or declare a no contest and refund all wagers except as otherwise provided in the rules involving multi-race wagers.
(2) Interference, Jostling or Striking (a) A jockey shall not ride carelessly or willfully so as to permit his/her mount to interfere with, impede or intimidate any other horse in the race.
(b) No jockey shall carelessly or willfully jostle, strike or touch another jockey or another jockey's horse or equipment (c) No jockey shall unnecessarily cause his/her horse to shorten its stride so as to give the appearance of having suffered a foul.
(3) Maintaining a Straight Course (a) When the way is clear in a race, a horse may be ridden to any part of the course, but if any horse swerves, or is ridden to either side, so as to interfere with, impede or intimidate any other horse, it is a foul. (b) The offending horse may be disqualified, if in the opinion of the stewards, the foul altered the finish of the race, regardless of whether the foul was accidental, willful or the result of careless riding.
(c) If the stewards determine the foul was intentional, or due to careless riding, they may fine or suspend the guilty jockey.
(d) In a straightaway race, every horse must maintain position as nearly as possible in the lane in which it starts.
If a horse is ridden, drifts or swerves out of its lane in such a manner that it interferes with, impedes or intimidates another horse, it is a foul and may result in the disqualification of the offending horse.
(4) Disqualification (a) When the stewards determine that a horse shall be disqualified for interference, they may place the offending horse behind such horses as in their judgement it interfered with, or they may place it last.
(b) If a horse is disqualified for a foul, any horse or horses with which it is coupled as an entry may also be disqualified.
(c) The stewards may determine that a horse shall be unplaced for the purpose of purse distribution and time trial qualification.
(d) In determining the extent of disqualification, the stewards in their discretion may:
(i) declare null and void a track record set or equaled by a disqualified horse, or any horses coupled with it as an entry; (ii) affirm the placing judges' order of finish and suspend a jockey if, in the stewards' opinion, the foul riding did not affect the order of finish; or (iii) disqualify the offending horse and not suspend a jockey if in the stewards' opinion the interference to another horse in a race was not the result of an intentional foul or careless riding on the part of a jockey.
(5) Horses Shall be Ridden Out
(a) All horses shall be ridden out in every race.
A jockey shall not ease up or coast to the finish, without adequate cause, even if the horse has no apparent chance to win prize money.
(6) Use of Whips
(a) Although the use of a whip is not required, any jockey who uses a whip during a race shall do so only in a manner consistent with exerting his/her best efforts to win.
(b) In all races where a jockey will ride without a whip, an announcement of such fact shall be made over the public address system.
(c) No electrical or mechanical device or other expedient designed to increase or retard the speed of a horse, other than the ordinary whip approved, shall be possessed by anyone, or applied by anyone to the horse at any time on the grounds of the association during the meeting, whether in a race or otherwise.
(d) Whips shall not be used on two-year-old horses before April 1 of each year.
(e) Indiscriminate use of the whip is prohibited including whipping a horse:
(i) On the head, flanks or on any other part of its body other than the shoulders or hind quarters; (ii) during the post parade except when necessary to control the horse; (iii) excessively or brutally causing welts or breaks in the skin;
i. when the horse is clearly out of the race or has obtained its maximum placing; or ii. persistently even though the horse is showing no response under the whip.
(7) Returning After the Finish (a) After a race has been run, the jockey shall ride promptly to the finish line, dismount and report to the clerk of scales to be weighed in.
Jockeys shall weigh in with all pieces of equipment with which they weighed out.
(b) If a jockey is prevented from riding to the finish line because of an accident or illness to the jockey or the horse, the jockey may walk or be transported to the scales, or may be excused from weighing in by the stewards.
(8) Unsaddling (a) No person shall assist a jockey with unsaddling except with permission of the stewards and no one shall place a covering over a horse before it is unsaddled.
(9) Weighing In (a)
A jockey shall weigh in at the same weight at which he/she weighed out, and if under that weight by more than two pounds, his/her mount shall be disqualified from any portion of the purse money.
In the event of such disqualification, all monies wagered on the horse shall be refunded unless the race has been declared official.
If any jockey weighs in at more than two pounds over the proper or declared weight, the jockey shall be fined or suspended or ruled off by the stewards, having due regard for any excess weight caused by rain or mud.
The case shall be reported to the Commission for such action, as it may deem proper.
(10) Dead Heats (a) When a race results in a dead heat, the dead heat shall not be run off, owners shall divide except where division would conflict with the conditions of the races.
(b) When two horses run a dead heat for first place, all purses or prizes to which first and second horses would have been entitled shall be divided equally between them; and this applies in dividing all purses or prizes whatever the number of horses running a dead heat and whatever places for which the dead heat is run.
(c) In a dead heat for first place, each horse involved shall be deemed a winner and liable to penalty for the amount it shall receive.
(d) When a dead heat is run for second place and an objection is made to the winner of the race, and sustained, the horses that ran a dead heat shall be deemed to have run a dead heat for first place.
(e) If the dividing owners cannot agree as to which of them is to have a cup or other prize that cannot be divided, the question shall be determined by lot by the stewards.
(f) On a dead heat for a match, the match is off.
4.11(VII) PROTESTS, OBJECTIONS 
(A) Stewards to Inquire
(1) The stewards shall take cognizance of foul riding and, upon their own motion or that of any racing official or person empowered by this chapter to object or complain, shall make diligent inquiry or investigation into such objection or complaint when properly received.
(B) Race Objections
(1) An objection to an incident alleged to have occurred during the running of a race shall be received only when lodged with the clerk of scales, the stewards or their designees, by the owner, the authorized agent of the owner, the trainer or the jockey of a horse engaged in the same race.
(2) An objection following the running of any race must be filed before the race is declared official, whether all or some riders are required to weigh in, or the use of a fast official procedure is permitted.
(3) The stewards shall make all findings of fact as to all matters occurring during and incident to the running of a race; shall determine all objections and inquiries, and shall determine the extent of disqualification, if any, of horses in the race.
Such findings of fact and determinations shall be final.
(4) In the case of disqualification the Stewards shall immediately make public the reason for the disqualification and the same shall be announced over the public address system.
(C) Prior Objections
(1) Objections to the participation of a horse entered in any race shall be made to the stewards in writing, signed by the objector, and filed not later than one hour prior to post time for the first race on the day which the questioned horse is entered.
Any such objection shall set forth the specific reason or grounds for the objection in such detail so as to establish probable cause for the objection.
The stewards upon their own motion may consider an objection until such time as the horse becomes a starter.
(2) An objection to a horse which is entered in a race may be made on, but not limited to, the following grounds or reasons: (a) A misstatement, error or omission in the entry under which a horse is to run; (b) the horse that is entered to run is not the horse it is represented to be at the time of entry, or the age was erroneously given; (c) the horse is not qualified to enter under the conditions specified for the race, or the allowances are improperly claimed or not entitled the horse, or the weight to be carried is incorrect under the conditions of the race; (d) the horse is owned in whole or in part, or leased or trained by a person ineligible to participate in racing or otherwise ineligible to own a race horse as provided in these rules; or (e) the horse was entered without regard to a lien filed previously with the racing secretary.
(3) The stewards may scratch from the race any horse that is the subject of an objection if they have reasonable cause to believe that the objection is valid.
(D) Protests
(1) A protest against any horse that has started in a race shall be made to the stewards in writing, signed by the protestor, within 72 hours of the race exclusive of non-racing days.
If the incident upon which the protest is based occurs within the last two days of the meeting, such protest may be filed with the Commission within 72 hours exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays or official holidays.
Any such protest shall set forth the specific reason or reasons for the protest in such detail as to establish probable cause for the protest.
(2) A protest may be made on any of the following grounds: (a) Any grounds for objection as set forth in this chapter; (b) the order of finish as officially determined by the stewards was incorrect due to oversight or errors in the numbers of the horses that started the race; (c) a jockey, trainer, owner or lessor was ineligible to participate in racing as provided in this chapter; (d) the weight carried by a horse was improper, by reason of fraud or willful misconduct; or (e) an unfair advantage was gained in violation of the rules.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the time limitation on the filing of protests shall not apply in any case in which fraud or willful misconduct is alleged provided that the stewards are satisfied that the allegations are bona fide and verifiable.
(4) No person shall file any objection or protest knowing the same to be inaccurate, false, untruthful or frivolous.
(5) The stewards may order any purse, award or prize for any race withheld from distribution pending the determination of any protest.
In the event any purse, award or prize has been distributed to an owner or for a horse which by reason of a protest or other reason is disqualified or determined to be not entitled to such purse, award or prize, the stewards or the Commission may order such purse, award or prize returned and redistributed to the rightful owner or horse.
Any person who fails to comply with an order to return any purse, award or prize erroneously distributed shall be subject to fines and suspension.
4.12: Forfeitures and Suspensions
(1) No racing official other than the Stewards and the Starter shall have the right to impose a forfeiture or suspension.
(2) The Stewards may not rescind a forfeiture, except with the approval of the Commission.
(3) A racing official imposing a forfeiture or suspension shall report it promptly to the Racing Commission in writing.
(4) All forfeitures shall be paid to the Racing Commission within 48 hours after imposition.
(5) Any official, owner, trainer or any person licensed by the Massachusetts Racing Commission who shall obtain food, feed, shelter, drugs, transportation, services for horses, veterinary services or supplies for himself or others whether they be licensed or not, and fails to pay the fair market value to the person or persons from whom said services or supplies are obtained may be guilty of conduct detrimental to the best interest of racing and may be suspended at the discretion of the Stewards or the Commission, however, neither the Association nor the Massachusetts Racing Commission shall be obligated to collect debts from horsemen or other personnel licensed by the Commission.
4.13: General Rules
(1) The definitions and interpretations of racing terms, heretofore set forth as well as the Foreword are to be considered in connection with 205 CMR 4.00 and as part of them.
(2) All owners and trainers of horses and their stable employees are subject to the Laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and the Rules promulgated by its Commission immediately upon acceptance and occupancy of stabling accommodations from or approved by an Association or upon making entry to run on its track.
(3) Owners, trainers and stable employees shall abide by said Laws and Rules and accept the decision of the Stewards on any and all questions to which their authority extends, subject to their right of appeal to the Commission.
(4) Every person participating in and every patron of a licensed Race Meeting shall abide by said Laws and Rules, and accept the Stewards' decisions on any and all questions to which their authority extends, subject to the right of appeal to the Commission.
(5) During the running of any racing meeting licensed by this Commission all exercise boys while exercising horses, all pony riders in post parades and association out-riders shall wear a protective helmet and vest of a type approved by the Stewards.
(6) No person shall use improper, profane or indecent language to a racing official.
(7) No person shall in any manner, or at any time, disturb the peace or make himself obnoxious on the grounds of an Association.
(8) No person shall make a handbook or a foreign book on the grounds of an Association.
(9) No person shall solicit for or bet from a handbook or foreign book on the grounds of an Association.
(10) No person shall make a bet with a handbook or foreign book on the grounds of an Association.
(11) Any person, who participates in an unrecognized meeting anywhere, either as a racing official or as an owner, trainer or jockey, may be adjudged guilty of conduct detrimental to racing.
(12) No person or horse ruled off, or under suspension by any recognized turf authority, trotting association included, shall be admitted to the grounds of any Association.
(For exception see 205 CMR 4.15(22).)
(13) No person shall be allowed in the Steward's stand unless previous permission is obtained from the Stewards.
(14) Any person who has been convicted by any court anywhere for illegal possession, sale or giving away of narcotics may be ruled off.
(15) Any person who has been arrested and/or charged with a violation of the law may be suspended until such time as said charge has been adjudged.
(16) If any owner, trainer, jockey, stable employee, or other person solicits bets from the public by correspondence or other methods, to be made on any horse which is to run on a track in Massachusetts, such person or persons shall be ruled off.
(17) When a person is ruled off a course or suspended, every horse owned in whole or in part by him shall be ineligible to be entered or to start in any race until said horse has been reinstated either by the rescinding of his owner's penalty or his transfer through bona fide sale to an ownership acceptable to the Stewards.
(18) When a person is ruled off a course or suspended, any horse which is under his care, management, training or superintendence shall not be qualified to be entered or to start in any race until said horse has been reinstated by the rescinding of said person's penalty or by the placement of the horse in the hand of a licensed trainer and the approval of the transfer by the Stewards.
(19) When a person is ruled off a course or suspended, he shall not be qualified, whether acting as agent or otherwise to subscribe for or to enter or run any horse in any race either in his own name or in that of any other person until the rescinding of that person's penalty.
(20) Any horse that has been the subject of fraudulent practice may be disqualified.
(21) When a person is ruled off for a fraudulent practice in relation to a particular horse, wholly or partly belonging to him, he shall return all money or prizes that such horse has fraudulently won.
(22) Violators of any rule will be subject to ejection from the grounds, and/or to forfeiture, suspension or ruling off.
(23) No horse will be allowed at a track and no horse shall be entered or permitted to start unless a current, valid health certificate showing that said horse has been examined and found to be free from symptoms of any infections or communicable disease, is on file with the Racing Secretary.
The health certificate is valid when it is made by an accredited veterinarian licensed by the State Authority that governs licensing veterinarians in the state where the examination and certificate were made.
It is current if it is dated not more than ten days prior to the date horse described in the certificate arrives at a Massachusetts race track for the first time in a calendar year and any time he is shipped thereafter.
A horse requires a new health certificate each time that he is shipped.
The certificate shall include the temperature of the horse at the time he was examined.
The Association conducting the racing meeting is responsible for compliance with this rule.
(24) The Stewards may suspend for no greater period than ten days beyond the close of the meeting anyone whom they have authority to supervise, or they may impose a forfeiture, not exceeding $500.00.
All such suspensions and forfeitures must be reported to the Commission.
If the punishment so imposed is not in the opinion of the Stewards sufficient, they shall so report to the Commission.
(25) Complaints against racing official (other than a Steward) or his assistant shall be made to the Stewards in writing and be signed by the complainant.
Complaints against a Steward shall be made in writing to the Commission and be signed by the complainant.
(26) When a hearing is to be held by the Board of Stewards, the person or persons involved must be properly notified and given the opportunity to hear all of the evidence presented against them.
If any summoned or notified party shall fail to appear, an order or ruling may be made against them by default.
(27) Every racing Association, the Commission or the Stewards investigating for violations of the law or the 205 CMR 4.00 adopted by the Commission shall have the right to permit persons authorized by any of them to search the person, or enter and search the buildings, stables, rooms, vehicles or other places within the grounds of the association, or at other places where horses which are eligible to race are kept together with the personal property and effects contained therein.
Every licensed person or person permitted to pursue his/her occupation or employment within the grounds of any association by accepting his/her license or such permission does thereby irrevocably consent to such search as aforesaid and waive and release all claims or possible actions for damages that he/she may have by virtue of any action taken under 205 CMR 4.00.
(28) No person shall make false or misleading statements to the Stewards.
4.14: Handicapper
(1) The Handicapper, who may be the Racing Secretary, shall assign the weights to be carried by each horse in the handicap.
(2) Handicapper shall append to the weights for every handicap the day and hour from which winners will be liable to weight penalty.
(3) If there are no penalties that fact shall be appended to the weights.
No alteration of weights shall be made after publication.
(4) In case of omission, through error, of the name or weight of a horse duly entered, the Handicapper shall rectify the omission.
4.15: Jockey
(1) Each jockey must obtain a license from the Commission.
(2) No person under 18 years of age will be licensed by the Commission as an Apprentice Jockey, or Jockey, save and except those Apprentice Jockeys or Jockeys, under 18 years of age, who have been licensed in another jurisdiction.
(3) No boy who has never ridden in a race shall be granted a license.
(4) No jockey shall be the owner of any racehorse.
(5) A jockey shall not ride or agree to ride in any race without the consent of the owner or trainer to whom he is under contract.
(6) Jockeys are required to present themselves to be weighed out at the time fixed by the Clerk of the Scales.
(7) All jockeys shall faithfully fulfill all engagements in respect to racing.
(8) A jockey may not ride in any race against a starter of his contract employer unless his mount and his contract employer's starter are both in the hands of the same trainer.
(9) In riding a race a jockey must be neat in appearance.
All riders must wear a protective helmet of a type approved by the Commission; jacket of silk, satin or waterproof, white or light colored breeches, and top boots.
(10) A jockey must wear the colors of the owner or owners of the horse he is riding (except by special permission of the Stewards, which permission shall be posted on the Bulletin Board together with notice of the colors the jockey shall wear), and a number of the saddle cloth corresponding to the number of the horse as exhibited after weighing out.
(11) A jockey shall not be allowed to smoke in public while wearing racing colors.
(12) Every jockey riding a race shall wear a protective helmet of a type that shall be approved by the Commission.
Weight of said protective helmet shall not be included in the jockey's weight.
(13) A jockey shall wear a number on his right arm and it and the saddle cloth number shall correspond to the number of the horse in the official program.
(14)
Every jockey who is engaged to ride in a race shall report to the scale room on the day of the race at the time required by the officials.
He shall then report his engagements and overweight, if any to the Clerk of the Scales, and thereafter shall not leave the jockey room, except to view the races from a point approved by the Stewards or to ride in a race, until all of his engagements of the day have been fulfilled.
(15) All jockeys must pass a physical examination once a year, before the commencement of a meeting, by a doctor approved by the Commission.
The Stewards may require that any jockey be re-examined and may refuse to allow any jockey to ride until he successfully passes such examination.
(16) No jockey shall make a bet on any race nor accept the promise, or the token of any bet, with respect to the race in which he is riding, except through or from the owner or trainer of the horse he rides, and then only on that horse.
(17) No jockey in racing attire shall enter the betting area.
(18) If an owner or trainer engages two or more jockeys for the same race he shall pay the losing amount fee for each engaged jockey not riding in the race, as well as the proper fee to the jockey who does ride.
(19) In a dead heat the jockeys involved shall divide equally the sum total of the fees they would have received individually had one beaten the other or others.
Likewise the owners of the horses involved shall pay their equal share.
(20) A jockey under suspension shall not be permitted to ride in a race for any one during the period of his suspension.
(21) The suspension of a jockey for an offense not involving fraud shall begin on the second day after the ruling, unless otherwise ordered by the Stewards.
A suspension for fraud shall begin immediately after the ruling.
(22) A jockey temporarily suspended may be permitted to exercise or gallop horses during the morning hours and to lodge on the grounds of the association at night.
In the discretion of the Stewards his badge may be taken up and they may refuse him admission to the grounds during racing hours.
(23) A forfeiture must be paid by the jockey himself and any other person paying it shall be subject to punishment.
(24) Every jockey may have one agent and no more.
All engagements to ride, other than those for his contract employer, shall be made by himself, his agent or his employer.
(25) No jockey shall have an attendant other than those provided by the association.
Such attendants shall be paid from an assessment collected by the Association from the jockeys.
(26) Employers retaining the same jockeys have precedence according to priority of the retainers as specified in the contracts.
4.16: Jockey Agents
(1) Each jockey agent must obtain a license from the Commission.
(2) Jockey Agents will pay only one license fee in any calendar year.
(3) The Stewards may permit an applicant to act pending decision of his application for a license.
(4) A jockey agent may represent up to two jockeys and one apprentice, providing the conditions justify and upon approval of the Stewards.
(5) No jockey agent shall make or assist in the making of any engagement for any rider other than those that he is licensed to represent.
(6) If, for good reasons, a jockey agent is short of his permissible quota of jockeys and wishes to take on the task of making engagements for a rider not named in his license, he must obtain permission from the Stewards and the Commission before making any such engagements.
(7) If any jockey agent gives up the making of engagements for any rider he shall immediately notify the Stewards, the Commission and the Racing Secretary; and he shall also turn over to the Stewards a list of any unfilled engagements he may have made for that rider.
(8) A jockey agent may charge a jockey or apprentice for each mount obtained by him, but shall receive no recompense for engagements made by the rider himself or by his contract employer.
(9) Each jockey agent shall keep, on a form provided by the Association a record by races of all engagements made by him or by others, for the jockeys he is handling.
Calls shall be numbered in the order of their priority whenever more than one is given for any rider in any race.
This record must be kept up to date and held ready at all times for inspection by the Stewards or the Racing Secretary.
(11) No person other than a jockey agent in good standing shall make engagements for an apprentice jockey or jockey.
However, a jockey not represented by an agent may make his own engagements.
(12) The Stewards in the light of the records submitted by the jockey agent will adjust all rival claims for the service of a rider and first call shall have priority.
(13) A jockey agent shall not give to anyone directly or indirectly, any information nor advice, or engage in the practice commonly known as "touting," for the purpose of influencing any person, or that would tend to do so, in the making of a wager on the result of any race.
(14) Any agent who falsifies his record shall be penalized by the revocation of his license and any agent penalized shall be ineligible for another license for a term of 12 months from the day of the revocation.
(15) Jockey agents will be called upon to explain rival claims for any mount or for any rider and inability to satisfy the Stewards that the rival claim arose through honest bona fide error shall be considered a falsification of records.
(16) Jockey agents shall not be allowed in the paddock at any time.
(17) Under no circumstances shall a jockey agent be permitted within the saddling enclosure during racing hours nor shall said agent have access to the jockey quarters at any time; nor said agent be allowed on the track proper at the conclusion of any race run; nor shall said agent communicate with any jockey during racing hours.
4.17: Jockey Apprentices
1.
Any person 18 years or older, who has never previously been licensed as a jockey in an country, and who has of his/her own free will and if under age, with the written consent to his/her parents or guardian, bound himself/herself to an owner or trainer for a term of not less than three nor more than five years (subject to written extension if made for less than five years) by written contract approved by and filed with the Massachusetts State Racing Commission, and after at least one year of service with a racing stable, may claim in all overnight races, except handicaps, the following allowances: (a) An apprentice shall ride with a five-pound allowance beginning with his/her first mount.
The apprentice shall continue to ride with this allowance for one full year from the date of his/her fifth winning mount.
If after riding one full year from the date of his/her fifth winning mount, the apprentice has failed to ride a total of 40 winners from the date of his/her first winning mount, he/she shall continue to ride with a five-pound weight allowance for one more year from the date of his/her fifth winning mount or until he/she has ridden a total of 40 winners, whichever comes first.
(b) After the completion of conditions above, for one year the apprentice may claim three pounds when riding horses owned by his original contract employer provided the contract has not been permanently transferred or sold since he/she rode his/her first winner.
(2) Apprentice contracts entered into in Massachusetts must be made on forms supplied by the Commission and must be accompanied by birth certificate.
An exact copy of the original contract shall be filed permanently with the Commission.
(3) No apprentice shall be permitted to acquire his own contract.
(4) If, by mutual consent between the contract holder and the apprentice and his parents or guardian, if under age, the contract is terminated before the expiration date, the contract is then null and void and cannot be transferred to another owner or trainer.
(5) If a person has been licensed he/she shall be allowed one contract only during his/her lifetime.
However, this rule shall not prevent the transfer of the contract to another owner or trainer provided said transfer has the consent of the apprentice, and if under age, his/her parents or guardian, and the contract holder.
All extensions of apprentice contracts shall be subject to the conditions of 205 CMR 4.17(6).
(6) Under exceptional circumstances, such as inability of an apprentice to ride because of service in the armed forces of the United States, personal injuries in the conduct of his/her duty, restrictions on racing, or other valid reasons which interfere with the allowance of one year from riding his/her fifth winner or the two year period in riding 40 winners, the Commission may extend the terms of the contract and the allowances provided by the Rules of Racing.
In order to qualify for an extension of the apprentice allowance an apprentice must have been rendered unable to ride for a period of not less than seven consecutive days during the period in which he/she was entitled to an apprentice allowance.
(7) The Massachusetts State Racing Commission will recognize an extension of time on an apprentice contract approved by another Racing Commission.
(8) Allowances under 205 CMR 4.17 must be claimed at the time of entry and shall not be abandoned except by the consent of the Stewards.
(9) All apprentice contracts, whenever entered into must be registered with the Commission.
(10) If an apprentice contract is transferred it must be signed by the transferor and transferee, accepted by the apprentice and, if under age, by his parents or guardian, and must be registered with the Commission by both the transferor and transferee.
(11) The original apprentice jockey contract shall be kept in full force and effect throughout its contract period after said apprentice has accepted one or more mounts.
Any and all amendments to said contract and all leases must be made a part of and either added to or attached to the copies in the possession of the parties and a like copy of said amendments and/or leases sent to the Commission where the original contract is filed.
(12) No owner or trainer shall be allowed to enter into a contract in Massachusetts with an apprentice jockey unless he is in control or possession of such a stable of horses as would, in the opinion of the Stewards, warrant the employment of an apprentice.
(13) No apprentice jockey will be licensed unless his contract employer is in control or possession of such a stable of horses as would, in the opinion of the Stewards, warrant his employment as an apprentice.
(14) An apprentice jockey shall not be permitted to ride for anyone other than his contract employer, without said employer's consent.
(15) An apprentice jockey may be granted an apprentice certificate issued by the Stewards, in lieu of a traditional apprentice contract.
The apprentice certificate shall grant an apprentice all allowances and conditions that are granted to an apprentice that is under contract.
(16) A licensed apprentice who loses his apprentice allowance for any reason shall obtain a jockey license before being permitted to ride again.
4.18: Jockey Contracts No contract employer shall have any interest in the earnings of a jockey.
4.19: Jockey Room Custodian (1) It shall be the duty of the Jockey Room Custodian to see to it that order, decorum and cleanliness are maintained in the jockey and scale rooms.
(2) The custodian shall assist the Clerk of the Scales in any way that official requires.
(3) The Commission shall see to it that no person, other than jockeys who have engagements for the day, racing officials, the Commission and the necessary jockey room attendants, is admitted to the jockey room after 12:00 Noon on a race day without consent of the Stewards for each time of entry.
(4) The Custodian shall oversee the care and storage of all racing colors.
(5) The Custodian shall oversee the jockey attendants and arrange their rotation among jockeys in the matter of weighing out.
(6) The Custodian shall see to it that no jockey attendant not licensed by the Association is permitted to assist any jockey at any time.
(7) The Custodian shall report to the Stewards any irregularities that occur in his province.
(8) The Custodian shall see to it that jockeys are neat in appearance and attired in keeping with the Rules when they leave the rooms to ride in a race.
4.20: Licensee's Duties, Obligations, etc.
(1) Before entering upon the discharge of their duties the following officials employed by the Association shall be licensed by the Commission; all stewards, racing secretaries, handicappers, starters, placing judges, timers, examining veterinarians and track veterinarians, patrol judges, paddock judges, clerks of scales, assistant starters, and such other persons as the Commission may designate from time to time because of their importance in the actual conduct of racing.
(2) No person under the age of 16 years shall be employed in or about the track of any association, except as may be permitted by the applicable laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
(3) It shall be the duty of each and every licensee of the Commission and the officers, officials, and employees of said licensee to observe and enforce 205 CMR 4.00 and the regulations from time to time adopted by said Commission.
Any and all of 205 CMR 4.00 may be amended, altered, repealed or supplemented by new and additional rules and regulations, at the discretion of the Commission.
Every license to hold a race meeting is granted upon the condition that the licensee therein named shall accept, observe and enforce 205 CMR 4.00, and any amendments or additions thereto.
(4) Each Association licensed by the Commission shall submit to the Commission a complete list of employees ten days after the first racing day.
This must contain in addition to the names and addresses of employees, the position each one is to fill or the duties he is to perform.
All additions made to or changes in the list of employees must be promptly reported to the Commission.
(205 CMR 4.20(4) shall not apply at State or County Fairs.)
(5) The Commission shall require each Association to obtain from every person employed by them a sworn statement, on a form prescribed by the Commission, setting forth information regarding citizenship, place or places of residence during the past two years and answer to any other questions the Commission may prescribe.
(6) Each Association shall provide and equip a first aid room within its enclosure.
(7) Distance poles of all associations licensed by the Commission shall be standard color designations that are, namely: 1/4 Poles Red and White 1/8 Poles Green and White 1/16 Poles Black and White (8) Each Association running a racing meeting shall keep a separate bank account to be known as the "Horsemen's Account" with at all times sufficient funds in such account to cover all monies due horsemen in regard to purses, stakes, rewards, claims and deposits.
Withdrawals from this account shall be only for such purposes and said account shall at all times are subject to audit by the Commission.
(9) Members of the Commission and its representatives shall have the right to full and complete entry to any and all points of the grounds of the Association licensed to conduct horse racing in Massachusetts.
(10) Each Association conducting racing shall before publishing submit to the Commission, the conditions for all races it proposes to hold, together with the stake, purse or reward, all of which shall be subject to the approval of the Commission.
(11) An Association, if legalized to operate Pari-mutuel betting, unless permitted to sell manually, shall maintain in good service a satisfactory totalisator.
(12) Each Association shall install at the finish line at their track, and shall adequately maintain, two photo finish cameras, to be approved by the Commission, to automatically photograph the finish of races.
The official photographer shall furnish promptly to the Commission a print of every photo finish.
(13) Each Association licensed to conduct a running horse racing meeting shall install and maintain an identification system of all persons who, by virtue of their occupation or duties, requires their presence in the stable area.
The use of a picture badge is subject to both the rules and regulations of the Massachusetts Racing Commission and the Association at which said person is working.
The badge is to be returned to the security department of the association at which the person is working when such person is suspended or not properly employed.
This system shall consist of: (a) A tamper-proof badge containing the name of the track; the year of issue; photograph of the individual to whom issued; his name, his position or occupation; the signature of said individual; the date the badge was issued; and any other pertinent information which the Commission may require.
(b) The identification badge shall be laminated both front and back and shall be of a type that will provide for a clasp.
A clasp shall be attached to every badge issued to provide that it may be worn in plain view.
(c) Badges shall be issued to all licensees of the Commission, i.e. owners, trainers, jockeys, agents and stable employees; to all Commission employees whose duties may require their presence in the stable area, to other persons as may be determined by the Stewards whose duties and occupation require their presence in the stable area.
(14) Each Association shall maintain in its files a copy of each badge issued.
This file shall be open to the inspection of the Commission and designated representatives of the Commission.
(15) Each Association shall provide that no person shall be admitted to the stable area and test area unless he is wearing an identification badge issued to him by the track.
Each person whose duties or occupation requires their presence in the stable area and test area shall wear his identification badge affixed to the outer clothing or otherwise, readily visible in plain view at all times, while in the stable area and other restricted areas.The Commission will hold the Association to strict accountability for full compliance with the provisions of 205 CMR 4.20(15).
(16) Any licensed person who allows another to use his or her license identification card or badge or any person who used the license identification card or badge of another person for the purpose of transferring any of the benefits pertaining thereto may be suspended, assessed a forfeiture, or both.
(17) No Association shall permit on its grounds any betting or other operations in contravention of any law of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts or of the United States.
(18) No Association shall permit bets to be made on the grounds on any race run outside said grounds without permission of the Commission.
(19) Handbooking shall be prohibited on the grounds and its operators shall be excluded therefrom.
(20) No gambling device, other than permitted by law, shall be permitted on the grounds.
Petty games of chance are prohibited.
(21) The Association shall choose the only attendants who will be permitted within the limits of 205 CMR 4.00, to: (a) assist a jockey after weighing out and until he leaves the paddock; and (b) assist a jockey in weighing in and until he arrives at the jockey room.
The Association shall pay such attendants for their services from an assessment collected from the jockeys.
A system of rotation of attendants shall be maintained.
(22) During the term of disqualification of any participant in racing, it shall be the duty of the Association to see to it that the privileges of his admission and identification badges are revoked, and that he is kept out of the grounds unless otherwise permitted to enter under certain conditions and at certain times as may be provided for elsewhere in 205 CMR 4.00.
(23) Each Association licensed by the Commission shall police its grounds at all times in such a manner as to preclude the admission and confiscate the identification badge of any person in and around the stables not duly licensed or authorized by the Commission.
(24) Each Association shall furnish to the Commission the names and addresses of all persons ejected by the Association from its grounds, together with the offense or offenses alleged against them, and any other material information relating thereto.
(25) Any person ejected from the grounds of an Association, by said Association, shall be denied admission to said grounds until written permission for his re-entering has been obtained from the licensee association and written notification of such permission shall forthwith be filed with the Commission and approved by the Commission.
(26) A person ejected from the grounds of an Association licensed by the Commission shall be refused admission to the grounds of all other licensed Associations in Massachusetts until he has been permitted to re-enter the track where he was originally ejected in accordance with the procedure as provided for in 205 CMR 4.20(25).
(27) All portions of purse money shall be made available to the winners thereof 48 hours (Sunday excluded) following their winning.
(28) No percentage of winnings shall be deducted by an Association for itself or for another person, club, or body, unless at the request of the person to whom such winnings are payable and except that an Association may withhold from winnings any money due it.
(29) Each Association shall provide within its grounds an equipped office for the use and to be at the disposal of, the Commission and all its officials.
(30) Each Association shall provide that concessionaires vending any liquid refreshment shall not permit the surrender of glass containers to customers.
(31) Each Association shall install and maintain in good working order a suitable telephone system between the Stewards' Stand, each of the Patrol Judges' Stands and the Starter's Stand.
(32) Each Association shall install and maintain in good working order a suitable telephone system between the Stewards' Stand and the Paddock.
(33) Each Association shall install and maintain in good working order a suitable electrical shoe board that shall be located in the infield and be of a size easily visible to the public.
This board shall be so equipped to provide for all of the information required by 205 CMR 4.24(3).
The type of board installed shall be subject to the approval of the Commission.
(34) Each Association licensed by the Commission shall notify the Commission prior to the opening of the meeting of the names of the person who will make the selections as they appear in the program; and the name of the person who will make up the morning line as it appears on the program.
Any change in the person so designated by the Association shall be promptly reported to the Commission.
(35) No Association licensed by the Commission shall assign stable accommodations or accept the entry of any horse five years or older which has been in competition during the immediately preceding two calendar years and has failed to finish first, second or third and which has started at least eight times during the said two calendar years period on a licensed horse racing track.
(36) If the Pari-Mutuel Manager is to be absent from the track for a complete racing program, the Association shall inform the Commission Accountant at the track at least one half hour before post time of the first race of the name of the person who will perform the duties of the Pari-Mutuel Manager during his absence.
4.21: Licenses, Registrations and Fees for Participants in Racing (1) The following persons shall be required to take out a license from the Commission and pay the applicable annual fee: Authorized Agent, Jockey, Jockey Apprentice, Jockey Agent, Owner and Colors, Trainer, Stable Employee, Veterinarian, Blacksmith, Racing Officials, Valet, Vendor, Outriders, Stable Name, Partnership.
(2) The fee shall accompany each application for license or registration.
They expire December 31st of the year of issue except stable employees' licenses that expire on March 31st.
(3) Licenses granted at mile tracks shall be valid at tracks of less than one mile as well.
(4) Licenses granted at tracks of less than one mile shall not be valid at mile tracks, however, additional fees shall not be required if a licensee from a half-mile track is granted a license at a mile track.
(5) All applications for licenses and registrations to participate in racing shall be made to the Commission on forms supplied by the Commission.
Any person making any false, untrue or misleading statements on an application for license or registration may be denied such a license or registration or may be assessed a forfeiture, suspended or both.
(6) Such applications shall be submitted first to the Stewards.
In considering each application for a license the Stewards may require the applicant, as well as the endorsers to appear before them and show that said applicant is qualified in every respect to receive the license requested.
Ability as well as integrity must be clearly shown by the applicant in order to receive the Stewards' recommendation for the granting of the license.
The Stewards may issue temporary licenses, to jockeys or apprentice jockeys.
If during the term of the temporary license, the Stewards make the determination that said jockey or apprentice jockey is not qualified as to the ability to receive a permanent license then the temporary license shall be revoked.
Temporary Owner Licenses may be issued to Trainers acting as agents for their owners or to authorized agents representing their owners.
Temporary licenses will be valid for a period of 30 days from date of approval.
Every Temporary Owner's License must be followed by an application from the owner received by the Racing Commission prior to the expiration of the 30-day Temporary Owner's License.
Failure to do so will result in an imposition by the Stewards of a fine against the trainer or authorized agent.
No horse will be allowed to race after the expiration of the Temporary Owner's License until a permanent owner's license is granted.
(7) Before recommending any application for a license it shall be the duty of the Stewards, individually and collectively, to ascertain if the applicant is qualified as to the ability, integrity and right to the license applied for.
And further, no application for a license shall be recommended by the Stewards if the applicant's previous conduct in Massachusetts or elsewhere is considered to have been objectionable, obnoxious or detrimental the best interest of racing.
(8) No application for a license or registration shall be recommended by the Stewards and no license or registration will be issued by the Commission unless satisfactory evidence first is presented to the Stewards that the person so applying will participate in the meeting over which the Stewards have supervision.
All persons licensed and registered by the Massachusetts State Racing Commission and all others whose occupation requires access to secured stable areas or participating in horse racing in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall be photographed and finger-printed under the supervision of the Massachusetts State Racing Commission Police Unit and in accordance with the Massachusetts State Police Identification System.
(9) The Commission may refuse to license any applicant who has been refused a license by any other State Racing Commission or turf governing body.
(10) The Commission may refuse to license any applicant whose previous conduct in Massachusetts or elsewhere in connection with horse racing is considered by the Commission to have been objectionable, obnoxious or detrimental to the best interest of racing.
(11) The Commission may also revoke any license if the holder of the same has violated any rule or regulation of the Commission governing his conduct in connection with horse racing, or where such conduct is objectionable, obnoxious or detrimental to the best interest of racing.
(12) No owner, trainer or agent shall enter or start a horse unless all licenses and registrations required by 205 CMR 4.21(1) have been filed.
(13) No owner, trainer or agent shall enter or start a horse until he has ascertained that each license or registration filed as required by 205 CMR 4.21(1) has been approved.
(14) Violators of the provisions of 205 CMR 4.21(12) and or 4.21(13) may be denied the right of participation in racing until the aforesaid rules have been complied with and, in addition, may be subject to suspension or a forfeiture.
(15) No application, except a license for ownership, will be considered for or granted to a person under 16 years of age.
If younger than 18 years of age, an applicant for an owner's license shall submit a notarized affidavit from his/her parent or legal guardian stating that the parent or legal guardian assumes responsibility for the applicant's financial, contractual and other obligations relating to the applicant's participation in racing within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
(16) When an ownership is in the name of both husband and wife, both shall be licensed and no partnership shall be required.
(17) Every Commission licensee exercising a horse shall upon request of an official timer, correctly identify the horse he is exercising and shall state the distance over which such horse is to be worked and the point on the race track where it is intended to start the workout.
(18) Every person following the vocation of exercise boy, hot walker, groom or stable foreman shall be licensed by the Commission.
(19) Application shall be made on printed forms furnished by and filed with the Commission and shall be accompanied with the applicable annual fee.
(20) Any applicant for licensing as a pony or exercise person, who is not registered as an employee of an existing licensee, may apply for such licensing provided that such applicant shall be approved by the Stewards and shall be required to be registered on a separate "Badge List" to be maintained by track security.
(21) Before a Trainer's License is issued by the Commission, said trainer shall submit evidence, satisfactory to the Stewards, that he has fully complied with the provisions of Worker's Compensation Laws of the State of Massachusetts and that he has secured compensation to employees in accordance with this law.
4.22: Naming of Jockeys (1) Jockeys shall be named not later than scratch time of the day of the race.
(2) Any subsequent change of a jockey must be sanctioned by the Stewards and must be promptly and publicly posted and announced.
4.23: Owner (1) Each owner holding a beneficial interest of 20% or more in a horse must obtain a license from the Commission.
If the owners are husband and wife, and their total beneficial interest is 20% or more in a horse, then they must both obtain a license from the Commission.
2.
An owner shall not enter or start a horse that:
a: is not in servicably sound racing condition b: has been trachea tubed c: has been nerved at or above the ankle
d: has been nerved or had cryosurgery performed on a nerve, except that horses that have had a neurectomy or cryosurgery performed on the posterior digital nerve below, and not at, the fetlock of one or more feet may be permitted to race e: is blind or whose vision is seriously impared in both eyes.
A horse blind in one eye may start only if the other eye has normal vision
f: does not comply with 205 CMR 4.00 regarding Coggins Test
(3) A list of nerved horses approved by the Track Veterinarian for racing shall be conspicuously posted in the Racing Secretary's office.
(4) If an owner changes trainers, he must notify the Racing Secretary and cause the new trainer to sign his name on said owner's registration.
(5) No owner shall employ a jockey for the purpose of preventing him from riding in any race.
(6) No owner shall accept, directly or indirectly, any bribe, gift or gratuity in any form that might influence the result of any race, or tend to do so.
(7) No owner shall move or permit to be moved any of his horses from the grounds of an Association until the horse is properly signed out of the grounds at the stable gate and after the racing Secretary has been properly notified.
(8) An owner shall see to it that a report is made promptly to the Racing Secretary or to the track Veterinarian of any and all sickness of his horses.
(9) The owner of a horse which is prevented from starting in a race because of his failure to pay the jockey fee for that race, or arrears against him or his horse, shall be liable for the declaration fee, and he and his horse shall be suspended until same is paid.
(10) No stable may have in its employment in any capacity any employee under 16 years of age, except as may be permitted by the applicable laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
4.24: Paddock Judge
(1) It shall be the duty of the Paddock Judge to check all contestants for each and every race and to have all horses properly identified.
(2) The Paddock Judge shall keep a record of all equipment carried by all horses in all races under his jurisdiction, permitting no change in equipment not authorized by the Stewards.
(3) The Paddock Judge shall, in each race, require the Plater in attendance in the Paddock to see to that all horses are properly shod and shall forthwith cause to be posted on the electrical shoe board the type of shoes with which each horses in the race is shod and whether with or without caulks and on which feet, or is shoeless as to any of its feet.
The said Paddock Judge shall report immediately to the Stewards the findings of the Plater.
This rule shall not apply at the State and County Fairs.
(4) The Paddock Judge shall report any irregularities to the Stewards.
(5) The Paddock Judge may permit a horse to be excused from parading and be led to the post upon payment of $10.00 to the Racing Secretary.
(205 CMR 4.24(5) shall not apply at State or County Fairs.
See Special Rules for State or County Fairs.)
4.25: Paddock to Post
(1) Permission must be obtained from a Steward to exercise a horse between races unless the horse is being warmed up on the way to and just prior to entering the paddock for the next race to be run.
(2) When a horse is being so warmed up before entering the paddock, the rider must display his official program number.
(3) In a race each horse shall carry a conspicuous saddlecloth number and a head number on his off side, corresponding to his number on the official program.
In the case of an entry each horse making up the Entry shall carry the same number (head and saddlecloth) with a distinguishing letter.
For example, 1-1A, -1X.
In the case of a Field the horses comprising the Field shall carry an individual number; i.e., 12, 13, 14, 15, and so on.
(4) Horses must be in the paddock at least 15 minutes before post time.
(5) All horses shall parade such a distance as is reasonable and proper in the opinion of the Stewards, unless excused by the Paddock Judge as provided in 205 CMR 4.24(5).
If a horse is so excused from parading and is led to the post he must pass over the same route as that followed by the parade.
(6) All horses shall carry their respective weights from paddock to post.
(7) Parading horses shall pass the Stewards' Stand in the numerical order of their exhibited number.
Only a horse being led by the parade leader, or excused from parading, may parade out of numerical order.
(8) In the discretion of the Stewards parading horses may be allowed to break out of numerical order after passing from in front of the stands, or may be required to maintain their order until arrival at the post.
(9) After the horses enter the track, no jockey shall dismount and no horse shall be entitled to the care of an attendant without consent of the Stewards or the Starter and the horse must be free of all hands other than those of the jockey or Assistant Starter before the Starter releases the barrier.
(10) After the horses enter the track and before the start, no jockey shall deliberately and without the consent of the Stewards or the Starter take his horse off the track.
Violators of this rule shall be punished by a forfeiture of not less than $50.00 for each offense and may be suspended or ruled off at the discretion of the Stewards.
(11) In case of accident to a jockey or to his mount or equipment, the Stewards or the Starter may permit the jockey to dismount and the horse to be cared for during the delay, and may permit all jockeys to dismount and all horses to be attended during the delay.
(12) If a jockey is thrown on the way from the paddock to the post, the horse must be remounted, return to the point where the jockey was thrown and then proceed over the route of the parade to the post.
(13) If the jockey is so injured on the way to the post as to require another jockey, the horse shall be taken to the paddock, another jockey obtained, and then ridden over any uncompleted portion of the exact route of the parade to the starting point.
(14) If a horse leaves the course while moving from paddock to post, he shall return to the course at the nearest practical point to that at which he left the course, and shall complete his parade to the post from the point at which he left the course.
(15) No person shall willfully delay the arrival of a horse at the post.
(16) No person other than the rider or Starter or Assistant Starter shall be permitted to strike a horse or attempt by shouting or otherwise to assist it in getting a start.
4.26: Partnerships
(1) Each and every partnership must be registered with the Commission.
Every member of the partnership with a beneficial interest of 20% or more shall be licensed.
Every member of the partnership with a beneficial interest of less than 20% shall not be licensed.
(2) Partnership papers shall, among other things, set forth the following: (a) the name and address of each and every person having an interest in the horse or horses involved.
(b) the relative proportions of such interests.
(c) to whom the winnings are payable.
(d) in whose name the horse or horses shall run.
(e) with whom the power of entry and declaration rests.
(f) the terms of any contingency, lease or any other arrangement.
(3) All partnership papers must be signed by all of the parties or by their authorized agents.
(4) In case of emergency, authority to sign declarations of partnership may be given to the Racing Secretary by a telegram promptly confirmed in writing.
(5) The part owner of any horse cannot assign his share or any part of it, without the written consent of the other partners, the said consent to be lodged with the Racing Commission.
(6) An alteration in a recorded partnership registration to be effective must be reported in writing to the Commission and signed by all partners.
(7) All the parties licensed in a partnership and each of them shall be jointly and severally liable for all stakes, forfeits and other obligations.
(8) In case of multiple ownership, each and every owner shall be in good standing in racing.
In a Limited Partnership and every other form of partnership, only the Managing General Partner, General Partners or a person designated to act on behalf of the partnership and partners whose percentage of ownership is 20% or more of the total partnership shall be licensed as owners.
A partner whose percentage of ownership is less than 20% of the total partnership shall not be licensed as an owner provided there is full disclosure by the partnership of: (a) The limited partner's name, address, date of birth, social security number and criminal history if any; (b) The percentage of total partnership interest owned by the limited partner.
If limited partners are husband and wife, and their total ownership interest in the partnership represents 20% or more of the total partnership, then they shall both be licensed as owners.
(c) Said disclosure statement shall be made under oath and accompanied by a copy of the partnership agreement.
If a limited partner with less than 20% interest of the total partnership could not obtain a license for reasons outlined in 205 CMR 4.21, the Limited Partnership shall not be licensed.
In the event that one of the persons listed in the Limited Partnership is suspended, all horses owned by the Limited Partnership may be suspended, at the discretion of the Stewards and or the Commission.
It shall be the responsibility of the General Partner or his licensed designee to notify the Stewards and Racing Commission in writing of any change in the ownership or interest in the Limited Partnership.
Only the Managing General Partner or a licensed partner or a person designated to act on behalf of the partnership and is licensed can enter a horse in a race.
4.27: Patrol Judges
The Patrol Judges shall for each race take their stations at a place designated by the Stewards.
They shall be subject to the orders of the Stewards, and they shall duly report to them all of their pertinent observations in each and every race and shall file reports on it in writing if so requested by the Stewards.
4.28: Placing Judges
(1) The Placing Judges shall occupy the Placing Judges' Stand at the time the horses pass the winning post in each and every race, and their duty shall be to place and record five horses or as many more as they think proper in the order of their finish in each race.
(2) The placing Judges shall properly display the numbers of the first four horses in each race in the order of their finish.
(3) When the Placing Judges differ in their placing the majority shall prevail.
(4) The Placing Judges shall make public their decision as promptly as possible.
(5) If it is considered advisable to consult a picture from the finish camera, the Placing Judges shall post, without waiting for a picture, such placements as are in their opinion unquestionable, and, after consulting the picture, make the other placements.
(6) The Judges may call for a picture from the photo-finish camera to aid them in arriving at a decision.
However, in all cases the camera is merely an aid and the decision of the Judges shall be final.
(7) In determining the places of the horses at the finish of a race, the Placing Judges shall consider only the relative position of the respective noses of such horses.
(8) Upon receipt of such notice the Stewards shall promptly display the sign "official."
(9) There shall be no alteration of placement after the sign "official" has been purposely displayed, except as in outlined in 205 CMR 6.04(4)(Pari-mutuel Rules).
(10) The Placing Judges shall each day file with the Commission a copy of the official placement of the first six horses in each race of that day, and shall supply to other officials such information in respect to the racing as the Association may require.
4.29: Postponement and Cancellation of Races
(1) If the whole or a part of a racing program is abandoned any purse race involved must be declared off.
(2) If the whole or a part of a racing program is abandoned any stake race involved may be postponed or declared off.
(3) If a stake race is declared off, all subscriptions and fees paid in connection with that race shall be refunded.
(4) Public notice shall be given at the earliest practicable time if a published race is declared off.
(5) No race that has closed with sufficient entries shall be declared off except by the Stewards.
4.30: Racing Officials
(1) Officials of a race meeting are as follows: Three Stewards; Three Placing Judges; Patrol Judges; Clerk of the Scales; Starter; Handicapper; Timer; Paddock Judge; the Racing Secretary; and the Clerk of the Course, who shall be the Racing Secretary of the Association holding the race meeting; or a person deputized by the Association.
(2) The Commission shall appoint two of the Stewards.
All other officials designated in 205 CMR 4.30(1) shall be appointed by the Association holding the meeting, all appointments being subject to the approval of the Commission, which reserves the right to demand a change of personnel for what it deems good and sufficient reasons.
The successor to official so replaced to be subject to the approval of the Commission.
(3) No one interested in the result of a race, either because of ownership of any horse entered, or if his sire or dam, or because of bets or otherwise, shall act as a racing official in respect to that race.
(4) No such racing official or his assistants shall wager money or any other chattel of value on the result of any race at the meeting.
(5) No such racing official or his assistants shall accept, directly or indirectly, any gratuity reward or favor in connection with racing at the meeting.
(6) No such racing official or his assistants shall, at the meeting, directly or indirectly, buy or sell any contract upon any jockey or apprentice jockey for himself or another.
(7) No such racing official or his assistants shall write or solicit horse insurance at the meeting.
(8) Each racing official and his assistants shall report to the Stewards all observed violations of 205 CMR 4.00.
(9) The Commission may, at its discretion, require an eye test of any Steward, Placing Judge or Patrol Judge, said test to be given by an agreed upon licensed optometrist.
The test to include particularly distance and color.
4.31: Racing Secretary
(1) The Racing Secretary or his deputy shall discharge all duties of his office expressed or implied, as required by 205 CMR 4.00.
(2) A list of nerved horses approved by the Track Veterinarian for racing shall be conspicuously posted in the Racing Secretary's office.
(3) The Racing Secretary shall compile an official program for each racing day, which shall state the time for the first race and give the names of the horses which are to be run in each of the races of the day.
(4) The program shall indicate the order in which each race is to be run; the purse, conditions and distance of each race; the owner, trainer and jockey of each horse; each owner's racing colors; the weight assigned to each horse; his name, number and post position, color, sex, age and breeding.
The names of the members of the Commission, Commission officials and all racing officials shall be printed on the program.
The program may show other pertinent data.
(5) The Racing Secretary shall keep a complete record of all races.
(6) The Racing Secretary shall receive all entries and declarations, and he or any other person designated by the Association may receive all stakes, forfeits, entrance monies, fees (including jockey's fees) purchase money in claiming races and all other money that can properly come into possession as agent for the Association for which he is acting.
(7) The Racing Secretary shall pay over when due, all monies collected by him to such persons as may be entitled to receive it.
(8) The Racing Secretary shall, in the interest of racing, keep himself thoroughly informed concerning such arrears as may be authoritatively listed or reported for recognized meetings, using such list as a means of eliminating undesirable people from racing.
The lists shall be compiled and kept accessible at all times to other officials of the race meeting, as shall all other information in his possession that is required for the conduct of the meeting.
(9) The Racing Secretary shall have the right to inspect any trainer's or jockey's license, partnership papers, all papers and documents with respect to a contract between a jockey and his employer, or employers; and papers relating to the appointment of authorized agents; jockey agents, or to the adoption of colors or to stable names.
(10) In making his program, the Racing Secretary shall respect these essential conditions: (a) No two-year-old shall compete in any race with older horses prior to September 1st of any year.
(b) No race for two year-olds prior to May 1st, of any year, shall be at greater distance than four and one half furlongs; and no race for two year olds after September 15th of any year shall be at less distance than 5� furlongs.
Provided, however, this shall not apply to tracks at less distance than one mile. (c) At a track with a chute at the six furlong pole, there shall be no races for three year olds and upward at less than six furlongs, except when track conditions, in the opinion of the Stewards, in the six furlong chute are hazardous for jockeys and horses.
Provided, however, this rule shall not apply to tracks less than one mile.
4.32: Urine, Other Tests and Examinations
(1) No person shall administer or cause to be administered any drug, internally or externally by injection, drench or otherwise, to any horse for the purpose of retarding, stimulating or in any other manner affecting the speed of such horse.
(2) The trainer, groom and any other person having charge, custody or care of the horse, are obligated to properly protect the horse and guard it against such actual or attempted administration.
If the Stewards shall find that any such person has failed to exercise proper protection and guarding of the horse, they shall impose such penalty and take such other action as they may deem proper under any of the rules of racing.
(3) A blood or urine specimen, or both, may be taken and tested from any horse or horses which may be designated by the Stewards and or the Commission for analysis.
The specimens shall be collected under the direction and supervision of the Commission's representatives.
Such specimens as may be collected shall be tested by the Racing Chemist at the Racing Commission Laboratory or other Laboratory designated by the Commission.
(4) The owner, trainer or his groom or other authorized representative shall be present in the testing enclosure when a saliva, urine or other specimen is taken from his horse and shall remain until the sample tag is attached to the specimen container.
Said tag shall be signed by the owner, trainer or their representative as witnesses to the taking of the specimen.
(5) Willful failure to be present at or a refusal to allow the taking of any such specimen or refusal to sign the specimen tag to the taking of a specimen, or any act or threat to impede or prevent or otherwise interfere therewith, shall subject the person or person guilty thereof to immediate suspension by the Stewards of the meeting and the matter shall be referred to the Commission for such further penalty as in its discretion it may determine.
(6) The representatives of the Commission may take for analysis samples of any medicine or other materials suspected of containing improper medication or drugs which could affect the racing conditions of a horse in a race, which may be found in the stable area or elsewhere on the track or in the possession of any person connected with racing on such tracks.
(7) In the event a horse is claimed, and has been designated for a post race test said claimed horse shall be brought to the State Testing Area by the previous owner, trainer, or agent, and said owner, trainer or agent shall remain with this horse in the testing area until a urine specimen or other sample or test is received from the horse, and said previous owner, trainer or agent shall sign all necessary documents.
(8) No person shall enter or start a horse in a race which has been administered any drug, narcotic, anesthetic, stimulant, depressant, tranquilizer or analgesic, which is not provided for elsewhere in these rules and which is of such character as could affect the racing condition of a horse in such race.
Should the analysis of a post race blood or urine specimen taken from a horse reveal that any medication, which for the purpose of definition, shall include any drug, narcotic, anesthetic, stimulant, depressant, tranquilizer or analgesic has been administered to a horse before a race, the Stewards shall impose such penalty and such other action as they deem proper under any of the rules of racing against every person found by them to have administered, attempted to administer, caused to be administered, caused an attempt to administer or conspired with another to administer such medication or against every trainer responsible to protect and guard such horse against said administration.
(9) The owner or owners of a horse so found to have received such administration shall be denied, or shall promptly return any portion of the purse or sweepstakes and any trophy in such race, and the same shall be distributed as in the case of a disqualification.
If a horse shall be so disqualified, the eligibility of other horses which ran in such race and which have started in a subsequent race before announcement of such disqualification shall not be in any way affected.
(10) Any portion of the purse if not already paid which is to be redistributed in accordance with this rule shall be held until the Commission approves such redistribution.
This rule shall apply only to the amount involved on the disqualified horse and shall not prevent payment due other horses in the race pending approval by the Commission.
(11) Every owner or his authorized agent or trainer of any horse or horses shall immediately, whenever requested by the Commission, submit any horse or horses of which he is the owner, authorized agent or trainer, to any Veterinary Surgeon designated by the Commission for such examination or tests as said Veterinarian may deem advisable.
(12) Any test or examination made by the veterinarian designated by the Commission may be witnessed by the Commission or by any of its representatives and by the owner or his authorized agent or by the trainer of the horse or horses so examined or tested.
(13) No person, other than a licensed veterinarian, within the grounds of a Racing Association where horses are lodged or kept shall have in or upon the premises which they occupy or have the right to occupy, or in their personal property or effects, or under their control, any hypodermic instrument which may be used for injection into a horse of any chemical substance, any substance prepared for the purpose of being injected into a horse, or any chemical substance which is prohibited from being dispensed by any Federal or Massachusetts Law without a prescription, unless they are in possession of documentary evidence that a valid prescription has been issued to them for such chemical substance.
A prescription shall not be valid unless it contains the name of the horse to be treated and the specific dosage to be administered.
Every Racing Association upon the grounds of which racehorses are lodged or kept, is required to use all reasonable efforts to prevent the violation of 205 CMR 4.32(13).
(14) Any owner or trainer once having been suspended for a violation of 205 CMR 4.32(8), and thereafter another analysis of the secretion from a horse as above provided or as provided by any other racing commission of any horse owned or trained by the said owner or trainer shows that a drug, narcotic, depressant, stimulant or local anesthetic has been administered or that any electrical, mechanical or other appliance has been used, which, in the opinion of the Stewards, is of such character as could affect the racing condition of the horse in such a race, the same shall be considered a second offense, and the said owner or trainer may be ruled off all tracks in Massachusetts.
(15) Any person found guilty by the Commission of any participation in or knowledge of the fact that any drug, narcotic, stimulant, depressant, local anesthetic or any electrical mechanical or other appliance has been used which, in the opinion of the Stewards is of such a character as could affect the racing condition of such a horse in a race, may be ruled off all tracks in Massachusetts.
(16) Every association and all officials and employees thereof shall give every possible aid and assistance to any department, bureau, division, officer, agent or inspector, or any other person connected with the United States Government or with the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, who may be investigating or prosecuting any such person they may suspect of being guilty of possessing any drug, narcotic, stimulant, depressant, or local anesthetic, hypodermic syringes or hypodermic needles, batteries used to stimulate horses or other similar appliances.
(17) Nothing herein contained under 205 CMR 4.32(1) to 4.32(16) inclusive shall alter or diminish the power of the Commission to review or originate action in any case covered by said 205 CMR 4.32(1) through (16) inclusive.
(18) A horse may receive Phenylbutazone up to and including the day of the race.
(19) The quantitative analysis which is performed on the urine sample of a horse may not exceed 165 micrograms of phenylbutazone and/or its metabolites per milliliter of urine and must contain at least trace levels of phenylbutazone and/or its metabolites as determined by the methods in current use by the official chemist.
(20) A trainer upon the prescription of a licensed veterinarian may perform the oral administration of Phenylbutazone.
Phenylbutazone that is injected must be administered by a licensed veterinarian.
(21) Each horse receiving Phenylbutazone must be on a Request for Phenylbutazone Use Form, which is provided by the Commission.
This form contains the date of request, the name of the horse, the name of the trainer and the name of the veterinarian.
This form must be received at the Commission Office on the grounds of the racing plant; 48 hours prior to said horse's next start and must be signed by the trainer.
(22) Once a Request for Phenylbutazone Use Form is filed, said horse shall remain on Phenylbutazone.
The filing of one form for each horse is sufficient for the remainder of the meet, unless the horse is removed from the Phenylbutazone program.
No entry may be accepted unless it is indicated on the entry form that said horse is on or off Phenylbutazone.
(23) The Phenylbutazone Removal Form provided by the Commission must be filed for any horse that no longer requires Phenylbutazone.
This form must be signed by both the Trainer and veterinarian and must be received at the Commission Office on the grounds of the racing plant, no later than noon, 48 hours prior to the horse's next start.
(24) Once a horse is removed from the Phenylbutazone Program, said horse must remain off Phenylbutazone for a period of 20 days, the date of filing being the first day.
(25) If any horse on the Phenylbutazone program changes hands either by sale, claim or otherwise, it shall be the responsibility of the new Trainer to contact the Racing Commission and fill out a new application to continue said horse on the Phenylbutazone program, or file a removal form.
(26) Two-year-olds are not allowed on the Phenylbutazone program.
(27) Should the analysis of a post race blood, urine or saliva specimen taken from a claimed horse result in a post race positive test, the claimant's trainer shall be promptly notified by the Stewards and the claimant shall have the option to void said claim.
An election to void a claim shall be submitted in writing to the Stewards by the claimant or his trainer.
(28) Bleeder Medication Program.
Any horse that bleeds from the lungs as a result of exercise induced pulmonary hemorrhaging, or is suspected of bleeding by his owner or trainer may be given an Endoscopic examination.
The Endoscopic examination must be done by the Commission or Association Veterinarian or in the presence of a Commission or Association Veterinarian, or a licensed Massachusetts Steward or Judge officiating at the current race meeting.
Such examination shall take place within two hours.
A horse may be placed on the Bleeder Medication Program if said horse is observed bleeding from one or both nostrils by the Racing Commission Veterinarian or Association Veterinarian.
(a) during a race (b) immediately post race or post exercise on the track, or in the test area.
A horse who is observed bleeding from one or both nostrils post race or exercise within two hours in the stable area must be confirmed a bleeder by an Endoscopic examination.
(29) Restriction from Racing Following Bleeding: A horse which bleeds based on the criteria outlined in 205 CMR 4.32(28) shall be restricted from racing at any facility under the jurisdiction of this Commission based on a 12 month period starting from the first EIPH (Exercise Induced Pulmonary Hemorrhaging) as follows: (a) 1st time - ten days; (b) 2nd time - 30 days - On bleeder list and a satisfactory work if the horse bled after racing on bleeder medication; (c) 3rd time - a minimum of 30 days on Veterinarians list to be removed at the discretion of the Association Veterinarian after a satisfactory work; (d) 4th time - barred for life.
The 2nd through 4th times above, the visual bleeding shall be during or following a race.
A list of bleeders shall be posted in the Racing Secretary's office so that other trainers may be aware of bleeder's status for claiming purposes.
(30) Removal from Bleeder Program.
A horse may be removed from the Bleeder Program upon the request of the owner or trainer.
A Lasix Removal Form provided by the Stewards must be filed for any horse that is removed from the Bleeder Program.
This form must be received at the Steward's Office no later than 48 hours prior to the horse's next start.
Any horse so removed may requalify for the Bleeder Program as provided for in 205 CMR 4.32(28).
(31) Reinstatement of Bleeder Program: (a) Automatic - this would be following EIPH on the track during or following a race.
A horse must serve suspension days relative to the number of times bled in a 12-month period; (b) Request by trainer or owner - Must serve the appropriate number of days suspension as outlined in 205 CMR 4.32(29).
(32) Entries: It is the responsibility of the person who enters a horse to provide the Racing Secretary with bleeder medication status of the horse on the entry blank and also provide the veterinary office with a "bleeder" certificate if racing from out of state.
For any other jurisdictions, a certification or letter from a Commission Veterinarian of that jurisdiction certifying the horse as a known bleeder may be accepted to place the horse on the Massachusetts Bleeder Program.
In the absence of such a letter and in the event confirmation cannot be made, the trainer may be allowed to file an affidavit with the Stewards that the horse has raced on bleeder medication in the jurisdiction from which it was shipped and accepts the responsibility to provide documentation from the State Veterinarian of that jurisdiction that the horse in question is a known bleeder and is receiving bleeder medication.
Such documentation shall be supplied within 14 days of the date such affidavit is executed.
Affidavits must be in the type and form required by the Commission office.
In the absence of either a certification or an affidavit, the horse shall be scratched if it received bleeder medication under the Massachusetts Bleeder Program prior to the race for which it was entered.
In the event an affidavit is filed in lieu of certification, any purse earned by that horse shall be held for up to 30 days, after which the matter shall be referred to the Stewards for possible punitive action.
(33) Bleeder Certification Form: Shall be the type and form, which is available at the Commission office.
(34) Bleeder Medication: (a) All horses on Bleeder Program shall be administered Lasix by a practicing veterinarian no less than 3cc (150 milligrams) and no more than 5cc (250 milligrams) intravenously not nearer than four hours prior to advertised post time of that entered race; (b) It shall be the responsibility of the practicing veterinarian to maintain a record of Lasix administrations, which shall contain date, time, dosage, and subject.
A copy shall be filed with a State Steward or Judge on a daily basis.
(35) All horses on the current bleeder's list will be placed automatically on the new list.
(36) Two-year-olds are allowed on the Bleeder (Lasix) Program.
(37) Persons may have in their possession, within the grounds of a Racing Association, hypodermic syringes, needles and chemical substances for use on their own person, provided they are in possession of documentary evidence that a valid prescription for such articles has been issued to them and that they have notified the State Steward: (a) that they are in possession of such articles; (b) of the size of the hypodermic syringes and needles; (c) of the chemical substance to be administered.
4.33: Starter
(1) Only the Starter or a deputy approved by him and by the Stewards may start a race.
(2) The Starter shall give all orders and take all measures necessary to insure a fair start.
(3) The Starter's decision as to the validity of a start shall be final.
Likewise his decision as to whether a horse was locked in the gate shall be final.
(4) The Starter may appoint his assistants subject to the approval of the Stewards.
(5) Horses are in the hands of the Starter from the moment they enter the track on the way from paddock to post.
They remain in his hands until the start.
(6) In case the alignment of the horses at the post is delayed, the Starter may permit jockeys to dismount and their mounts to be attended.
(7) Horses shall take their positions in numerical order from the inside rail, that order to be determined by postposition.
However, if the starter deems a horse unruly, said horse may take position out of order.
(8) All flat races shall be started out of a stall gate.
(9) In case of necessity, by permission of the Stewards, a gate may be used with the doors open.
(10) If the number of horses starting in a stake race does not exceed the capacity of the track, but does exceed the number of stalls in the gate, the surplus may be started from outside the gate.
(11) The Starter may place vicious and unruly horses on the outside and behind the line.
(12) The Starter shall report to the Stewards by whom or by what cause any delay was occasioned and any cases of misconduct by jockeys when under his orders.
(13) The Starter shall maintain and keep available to the Stewards a daily record of all horses handled at the gate.
(14) The Starter shall maintain a schooling list, and all horses shall be schooled to barrier or starting gate, if and when required under the personal supervision of himself or his assistants.
(15) Only the Starter shall have the authority to designate the horses that shall constitute the schooling list.
(16) The Starter shall file a copy of the schooling list with the Racing Secretary.
(17) The Starter shall report to the Racing Secretary as soon as a horse on the list has been schooled sufficiently to be permitted to start.
(18) A horse will not be eligible to start until the starter orders the name stricken from the schooling list.
(19) The Starter may impose a forfeiture or suspend a jockey for disobedience of orders or for attempting an unfair advantage.
Such forfeiture shall not exceed $200.
A suspension shall not take effect until after the last race of the next day, unless otherwise ordered by the Starter.
(20) The Starter shall report in writing to the Stewards and to the Racing Secretary all forfeitures and suspensions that he has imposed and no forfeitures or suspensions so reported shall be modified other than by the authority of the Stewards.
(21) The concurrent statements of the Starter and his assistants as to incidents of the start are conclusive.
(22) Neither the Starter nor his assistants shall mistreat or use abusive language to a jockey.
(23) The Starter's approval of the starting ability of all two-year-olds must be obtained before the same are permitted to start.
Likewise, his approval must be obtained for all older horses that have never started at a recognized meeting.
(24) A false start is void and the horses shall be started again as soon as practical.
Any horse running the course from a false start may be excused from the true race by the Stewards.
(25) If a horse is locked in the gate, the Starter shall immediately notify the Stewards who in turn shall immediately notify the manager of the Pari-Mutuel Department.
(26) No person shall give to any starter or assistant starter, nor shall any starter or assistant starter receive money, anything of value, or other compensation for such starter's or assistant starter's services in connection with the running of any race or races.
No Starter or assistant starter, shall either directly or indirectly bet on any race, or engage in any betting transaction nor have any interest in any horse.
4.34: Steeplechasing
(1) Steeplechases shall be conducted in conformity with 205 CMR 4.00 established in so far as they can be consistently applied.
To the extent that they cannot so be applied, modification thereto may be made by the Stewards in accordance with the Rules of the National Steeplechase and Hunt Association (New York).
(2) All horses engaged in Steeplechasing at a meeting must be registered either at the Jockey Club (New York) or with the National Steeplechase and Hunt Association (New York).
(3) All forfeitures shall be paid within 48 hours to the Commission.
(4) The jurisdiction of Steeplechasing at a meeting shall be vested with the Commission.
(5) Any dispute that may arise concerning what constitutes the standards and the rules that apply to Steeplechases shall be subject to appeal to the Commission; provided, however, that no such appeal shall be permitted to interrupt a program for the meeting, the question under dispute being subject to later adjudication by the Commission.
4.35: Stewards
(1) The Stewards shall have the power to interpret 205 CMR 4.00 and to decide all questions not specifically covered by them.
(2) In matters pertaining to racing, the orders of the Stewards supersede the orders of the Officers and Directors of the Association.
(3) The Stewards shall have general supervision over owners, trainers, jockeys, grooms and other persons attendant on horses, and also over all the other officials at the meeting.
(4) The Stewards shall have the authority to declare a race void and to order all wagers made thereon refunded if they shall determine that any occurrence before or during the running of such race calls for such action by them.
(5) The Stewards shall have control over and free access to all stands, weighing rooms, enclosures, and other places in use for the purpose of racing.
(6) All entries and declarations shall be under the supervision of the Stewards.
(7) The Stewards shall have the power to determine all questions arising with reference to entries and racing.
(8) All questions pertaining to which their authority extends shall be determined by a majority of the Stewards.
(9) The Stewards shall have the power to punish for violation of 205 CMR 4.00 any person subject to their control and in their discretion to impose forfeitures or suspensions or both for infractions.
(10) The Stewards may not impose a forfeiture in excess of $500.00.
If it is deemed necessary that a larger forfeiture should be imposed, the Stewards shall so recommend to the Commission.
(11) The Stewards may suspend a person or disqualify a horse.
The Stewards shall maintain a list of such disqualified horses and other horses that in the opinion of the Stewards are not competitive at that meeting or are dangerous to themselves, riders or other horses.
Horses on said list may not enter until permission to do so is given by the Stewards in order to remove a horse from said list.
No horse may be placed on said list unless prior thereto the Stewards state, in writing, the reason for placement of the horse thereon.
(12) The Stewards shall have the powers to exclude or eject from the premises and enclosures of the Association (a) any person who is disqualified for corrupt practices on the turf in any country; (b) any person who is under suspension by the Stewards of a recognized meeting or ruled off by any other Commission; (c) any person who is under their supervision.
(13) The Stewards may demand proof that a horse neither is disqualified in any particular; nor entered or owned, in whole or in part, by a disqualified person, or trained in whole or in part, by a disqualified person.
In default of proof, satisfactorily to them, the Stewards may declare the horse disqualified.
(14) The Stewards may postpone a race from race-day to race-day.
(15) The Stewards shall have the power to examine or cause to be examined at any time any horse stabled on the Association grounds, or in stabling approved by the Association.
(16) The three Stewards must be on duty during race time, which shall mean from one hour before post time for the first race of the day until the last race of the day has been made official.
(17) At least one of the Stewards, or his deputy, must be on duty within call of the Racing Secretary from the time of opening of overnight entries each morning until after the drawing of postpositions.
(18) The Steward may appoint his own deputy at any time.
(19) If there is only one Steward present at race time, said Steward shall appoint two other qualified persons to act with him as Stewards pro-tem. (20) If only two Stewards are present at race time, they shall by agreement appoint a deputy for the absent Steward; but if unable to reach an agreement, shall call upon the Racing Secretary to appoint said deputy.
(21) If none of the Stewards are present at race time, the Racing Secretary shall appoint three qualified persons, one of whom may be himself, to act as Stewards pro-tem. (22) When a vacancy occurs among the racing officials, other than the officials, other than the Stewards, prior to post time of the first race of the day, or when a vacancy occurs after the racing of the day has started, the Stewards shall immediately fill the vacancy.
The appointment shall be effective only for the day, unless the Association fails to fill the vacancy on the following day and notifies the Stewards of its action not less than one hour before the post time of the first race of the day.
Such appointment shall be reported immediately to the Commission.
(23) The Stewards shall take notice of any questionable conduct with or without complaint thereof.
(24) The Stewards may substitute a jockey of their selection on any horse.
(25) The Stewards may place any horse in the temporary charge of a trainer of their selection.
(26) In case of accident or casualty to a horse before a start, the Stewards may excuse said horse.
(27) The Stewards must investigate promptly, and render a decision in every objection and in every complaint properly made to them.
(28) The Stewards shall report all objections and complaints to the Commission as soon as received by them, and shall make prompt report to said Commission of their decision.
(29) The Stewards shall, not later than seven days after the end of each meeting, make a report to the Chairman of the Commission of all infractions of 205 CMR 4.00 and of all rulings of the Stewards upon matters coming before them during such meeting.
(30) Except in emergencies, no Steward shall grant permission for a change of horses' equipment after the close of entries for the race in which the changed equipment is to be carried.
(31) There shall be one or more timers.
They shall determine the official time of each race.
(32) The time recorded for the first horse to cross the finish line shall be the official time of the race.
(33) In the event that a horse establishes a track record in a race and if it later develops that the chemical analysis of any sample taken indicates the presence of a narcotic, stimulant, depressant or local anesthetic, then such track record shall be null and void.
(34) When electric timing is used, the races shall also be timed otherwise.
(35) The time shall be announced and displayed.
(36) A written report of the time of each race shall be made to the Clerk of the Scales for the reports to the Racing Secretary.
(37) No person may refuse to testify before the Stewards at any formal hearing on any relevant matter within the authority of the Stewards, except in the proper exercise of a legal privilege or unless representation is requested by an attorney or their association.
4.36: Trainers
(1) Each trainer must obtain a license from the Commission.
(2) No trainer's license or assistant trainer's license shall be considered or approved for an applicant less than 18 years of age.
(2) No trainer shall practice his profession except under his own name.
(3) The Stewards may permit a trainer to act pending action on his application.
(4) A licensed trainer may represent the owner in the matter of his entries, declarations and the employment of jockeys.
(5) A trainer shall have his horse in the paddock at the time appointed.
(6) A trainer shall attend his horse in the paddock, and shall be present to supervise his saddling, unless he has obtained the permission of a Steward to send his assistant trainer or another licensed trainer as a substitute.
(7) When a trainer is to be absent from his stable or the grounds where his horses are racing for a period of more than two racing days, and his horses are entered or are to be entered, he must provide a licensed trainer to assume the complete responsibility of the horses he is entering or running.
Such licensed trainer shall sign in the presence of the Stewards a form furnished by the Commission accepting complete responsibility of the horse or horses being entered or running.
(8) The trainer shall be responsible for and be the absolute insurer of the condition of the horses he enters regardless of the acts of third parties.
(9) Each trainer shall register with the Racing Secretary all the horses in his charge, giving the name, color, sex, age, breeding and ownership of each.
(10) The personnel of every stable and changes thereof shall be registered, by the trainer, with the Security Department at the track where their horses are racing or stabled, and shall be available at all times to representatives of the Commission.
(11) A trainer shall not have in charge or under his supervision any horse owned, in whole or in part, by a disqualified person.
(12) A trainer shall not have in charge, or under his supervision any horse owned, in whole or in part, by a jockey.
(13) No trainer shall accept, directly or indirectly, any bribe, gift or gratuity in any form which might influence the result of any race or which would tend to do so.
(14) No trainer shall move or permit to be moved any horse or horses in his care from the grounds of an Association until the horse is properly signed out of the grounds at the stable gate and after the Racing Secretary has bee properly notified.
(15) A trainer shall not enter or start a horse that: (a) is not in serviceably sound racing condition; (b) has been trachea-tubed; (c) has been "nerved" at or above the ankle.
a. has been nerved or had cryosurgery performed on a nerve; except that horses that have had a neurectomy or cryosurgery performed on the posterior digital nerve below, and not at, the fetlock of one or more feet may be permitted to race.
(e) is blind or whose vision is seriously impaired in both eyes.
A horse blind in one eye may start only if the other eye has normal vision.
(f) does not apply with the Rules regarding Coggins Test.
(16) A trainer shall report promptly, to the track Veterinarian, all horses in his care that have been nerved.
A list of nerved horses approved by the track Veterinarian for racing shall be conspicuously posted in the Racing Secretary's Office.
(17) No trainer shall employ a jockey for the purpose of preventing him from riding in any race.
(18) A trainer shall report promptly to the Racing Secretary or the track Veterinarian any and all sickness of his horses.
(19) Trainers of horses entered in the first and second races shall inspect the condition of their horse 1� hours before post time of the first race of the day on which entered to race.
If any horse is found, through accident or otherwise, to be unfit to race, the trainer shall report the fact to the Association Veterinarian at least one hour before post time of the first race of the day.
(20) It shall be the responsibility of the trainer of horses who have not started for a period of 60 days or longer, to have a recorded workout with the official clocker.
Any horse entered that does not have a recorded workout with the official clocker, shall be scratched.
4.37: Vendors of Horse Feed or Medicine
Any vendor of horse feed or medicine of any kind or description shall file with the Commission a list of products which he proposes to sell or deliver within the enclosure of the race track, and shall further submit any new preparation to be offered for sale for approval of the Commission Veterinarian and/or Chemist.
Should such vendor offer any preparation not so approved by the Commission Veterinarian and/or Chemist, or not so listed, he shall be denied the privileges of the stable area.
4.38: Veterinarians
(1) Each veterinarian practicing at a racetrack must secure a license from the Racing Commission.
The veterinarian must be a graduate Veterinary Surgeon in good standing, and licensed to practice under the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
Every licensed veterinarian licensed by the Massachusetts Racing Commission shall keep a written record of his practice concerning horses participating at Thoroughbred race meet in this state where performed at a licensed track or elsewhere which shall disclose: (a) The name of the horse treated.
(b) The type of treatment prescribed for and medicine administered to the horse.
(c) The date of such treatment.
Every licensed veterinarian shall produce such written records when requested by an Official of the State Racing Commission.
Veterinarians licensed by the Commission to practice their profession by the Commission to practice their profession shall not be eligible to hold an owner or trainer license at tracks under the jurisdiction of the Commission.
(2) Each entry shall be given a pre-race examination on the day of the race for which entered.
A duly licensed veterinarian employed by the Racing Association at whose track the services are rendered shall give such examination.
Said veterinarian shall make such examination as is necessary to determine the entry's fitness to race, and at his discretion may include the following: (a) Temperature; (b) Rate of pulse and respiration; (c) Removal of bandages and palpation of limbs; (d) Examination of eyes; (e) Locomotion of the horse.
Any unsoundness, that in the opinion of the examining veterinarian disqualifies an entry from racing, shall be promptly reported to the Stewards.
A qualified lay person, under the direct supervision of the examining veterinarian, may be utilized as an aid to the examining veterinarian.
Such person may aid in the pre-race examination by reporting any unsoundness, that may disqualify an entry from racing, to the examining veterinarian who shall further examine the horse in question and make a final determination.
(3) A list of nerved horses approved by the track veterinarian for racing shall be conspicuously posted in the Racing Secretary's office.
(4) A veterinarian shall be present in the paddock before each race, and he shall inspect each entrant.
If, in his opinion, any entrant is not in condition to compete in the race, he shall immediately notify the Stewards.
(5) In either of the aforementioned cases, stated in 205 CMR 4.38(2) and 4.38(4), the Stewards shall determine whether or not the horses shall be permitted to start.
If not permitted to start, the horse automatically goes on the Veterinarian's List, and thereafter shall not be permitted to enter until the veterinarian notifies the Racing Secretary and the Stewards that the horse is again fit to compete.
(6) A horse placed on the Veterinarian's List for bleeding must remain on said list for a minimum of ten calendar days.
A horse placed on the Veterinarian's List for bleeding a second time shall remain on said list for 30 calendar days and must have a satisfactory work if the horse bled while racing on bleeder medication.
A horse placed on the Veterinarian's List for bleeding a third time shall remain on said list for a minimum of 30 days and shall only be removed at the discretion of the Association Veterinarian after a satisfactory work.
A horse that bleeds a fourth time within a 12-month period, is barred from further racing in Massachusetts.
The second through fourth times as outlined above shall mean the visual bleeding during or following a race.
(7) A veterinarian shall be attendant on the Stewards and the Racing Secretary at scratch time each morning and shall examine such horse or horses as they request, and make report to the said racing official as promptly as possible.
(8) No owner or trainer shall employ a veterinarian who has not been duly licensed in accordance with the law of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
Any duly licensed veterinarian desiring to practice at a racetrack licensed by the Commission shall be approved by the Association conducting the meeting and shall list his name with the Racing Secretary.
The Association shall warn off all unlicensed veterinarians.
(9) No veterinarian employed by the Commission or by an Association shall be permitted, during the period of his employment, to treat or prescribe for any horse on the grounds or registered to race at the track by which said veterinarian is assigned or employed, for compensation or otherwise, except in case of emergency, at which time the Commission or Association Veterinarian may receive compensation for his services.
(10) All veterinarians shall file individual remittance certificates with individual blood samples when testing for equine infectious anemia.
Upon receipt from an approved testing laboratory, the certificates shall be returned to the trainer whose responsibility it shall be to safeguard said certificate and surrender same to a new owner and/ or trainer in cases of claims, sales or transfers.
All veterinarians shall notify the State Veterinarian immediately upon receipt of a positive report.
4.39: Walking Over
(1) If, at the time for hoisting the numbers only one horse shall have weighed out, that horse shall be ridden past the Judges' Stand, go to the post, and then move over the course.
He shall then be deemed the winner.
In case of a walkover, the horse walking over shall receive: (a) In overnight races, � of the winner's rightful share of first money.
(b) In stake races, � of the winner's rightful share of the added money and all fees.
(2) In case of a walkover, any money or prize that by the condition of the race would have been awarded to a horse placed second, or lower in the race, shall, if contributed by the owners, be paid to the winner.
If a donation from any other source, it shall not be awarded.
4.40: Weighing In
(1)
After a race has been run and after he has pulled up the horse he has ridden, the jockey shall ride promptly to the unsaddling area and there dismount, and present himself to the Clerk of the Scales to be weighed in.
If a jockey is prevented from riding his mount to the unsaddling area because of an accident or of illness either to himself or his horse, he may walk or be carried to the scales, or he may be excused by the Stewards from weighing in.
Except by permission of the Stewards, every jockey must, upon returning to the unsaddling area, unsaddle the horse he has ridden, and no person shall touch said horse except by his bridle.
No person shall assist a jockey in removing from his horse the equipment that is to be included in the jockey's weight, except by permission of the Stewards.
No person shall throw any covering over any horse at the place of dismounting until the jockey has removed the equipment that is to be included in his weight.
No jockey shall, before weighing in, willfully touch any person or thing, other than the equipment that is to be included in his weight.
Each jockey shall, in weighing in, carry over to the scales all pieces of equipment with which he weighed out.
Thereafter he may hand it to his attendant.
Each jockey shall weigh in at the same weight as that at which he weighed out, and if short of it by more than two pounds his mount shall be disqualified.
When a horse is disqualified under 205 CMR 4.40(8) and there is evidence of fraud or attempted fraud, any other horse in the race owned or controlled by the same interest or trained by the same trainer, also shall be disqualified.
(10)
No jockey shall weigh in at more than two pounds over the weight at which he weighed out, except in so far as said weight may have been affected by the elements.
4.41: Weighing Out (1)
The specified jockeys shall be weighed out for their respective mounts in each race by the Clerk of the Scales not less than ten minutes before the time fixed for the race.
In case of a substitution of rider after the original rider has been weighed out, the substitute rider shall be weighed as promptly as possible and the name of the substitute and his weight publicly announced and posted.
If a horse runs in hood, muzzle, martingale, breastplate, or blinkers, they must be included in the jockey's weight.
None of the following items shall be included in a jockey's weight: Protective helmet, as may be approved by the Commission; whip or a substitute for a whip, head number, bridle, bit or reins.
No bridle shall exceed two pounds in weight, and no whip (or substitute for a whip) shall exceed one pound in weight, unless approved by the Stewards.
No jockey except when riding for his contract employer, shall be weighed out for any race unless there has been deposited for him or guaranteed to him, with the Racing Secretary, his fee for a losing mount in the race, and the failure to deposit or guarantee said fee for the engaged jockey may be cause for declaring the horse out of the race.
The Association shall provide the only attendants who will be permitted to assist jockeys in weighing out.
4.42: Winnings (1) The winnings of a horse in a stake race shall be computed on the value of the gross earnings.
(2) Winnings shall include all net monies won in all countries, up to the time appointed for the start, including walkovers and forfeits but not second and third money nor the value of a prize not in money.
(3) Winnings during a year shall be reckoned from January 1st of that year.
(4) Winner or non-winner of a specified sum means winner, or non-winner of a single race of that value to the winner, unless otherwise stated.
(5) In computing the value of a series of races in which an extra sum of money is won by the winning of two or more races of the series, the extra amount shall not be included in the horse's winnings until the series, or that part of it, is finished and hence the extra amount is definitely ascertainable.
When ascertained it shall be added to the race which determined the extra amount.
(6) Foreign winnings shall be estimated on the basis of the normal rate of exchange prevailing on the day of the winner.
(7) The entrance money, starting and subscription fees, in every race, shall go to the winner unless otherwise provided in its conditions, but when from any cause a race is not run, all stakes or entrance money, if any paid, shall be returned.
4.43: Special Rules for State or County Fairs
M.G.L. c. 128A, � 9, second paragraph provides "The Commission shall have power to prescribe special rules, regulations and conditions applicable to horse and dog racing meetings held under licenses granted hereunder in connection with a state or county fair, or any exhibition for the encouragement of extension of agriculture."
4.44: Declarations and Scratches for State and County Fairs
In purse races and overnight handicaps with more than eight interests, owners shall have the right to declare out to that number before the time stipulated by the regulations of the Association, on the day of the race such right to be determined by lot when necessary.
Declarations below eight interests may only be made by permission from the Stewards.
4.45: General Rules for State and County Fairs
(1) The Stewards at meetings held in connection with State or County Fairs shall have the power to suspend anyone whom they have authority to supervise for no greater period than ten days beyond the close of the fair racing season in Massachusetts.
They may extend a suspension from one fair meeting to another within the fair racing season.
The Stewards at meetings held in connection with State or County Fairs may impose a forfeiture on anyone whom they have authority to supervise, not exceeding $500.00.
(2) Each Association licensed by the Commission to conduct a racing meeting in connection with a State or County Fair shall submit to the Commission a complete list of employees three days after the first racing day.
This must contain in addition to the name and addresses of employees, the position each one is to fill or the duties he is to perform.
All additions made to or changes in the list of employees must be promptly reported to the Commission.
4.46: Paddock Judge for State and County Fair
The Paddock Judge may permit a horse to be excused from parading and be led to the post.
REGULATORY AUTHORITY
205 CMR 4.00: M.G.L. c. 128A, � 9.
_________________________________________________________________
Massachusetts State Racing Commission One Ashburton Place, Room 1313 Boston, MA 02108 Phone: 617-727-2581 Fax: 617-227-6062
Privacy Policy
